How to obtain the Brain of the Cat, (Wilder).-Correction: Page 158, second column, line 7, "grains," should be "grams;" page 159, near middle of 2nd column, "successily," should be "successively;" page 161, the number of Flower's paper is 3.
Mr. Dopp desires to make the following correction in his paper in the last issue: "In my article on page 200 of "Science", the expression and should have been and being the velocity of light.
It may be conceded that after man had all his present faculties, he did not choose between the adoption of voice and gesture, and never with those faculties, was in a state where the one was used, to the absolute exclusion of the other. The epoch, however, to which our speculations relate is that in which he had not reached the present symmetric development of his intellect and of his bodily organs, and the inquiry is: Which mode of communication was earliest adopted to his single wants and informed intelligence? With the voice he could imitate distinictively but few sounds of nature, while with gesture he could exhibit actions, motions, positions, forms, dimensions, directions and distances, with their derivations and analogues. It would seem from this unequal division of capacity that oral speech remained rudimentary long after gesture had become an efficient mode of communication. With due allowance for all purely imitative sounds, and for the spontaneous action of vocal organs under excitement, it appears that the connection between ideas and words is only to be explained by a compact between speaker and hearer which supposes the existence of a prior mode of communication. This was probably by gesture. At least we may accept it as a clew leading out of the labyrinth of philological confusion, and regulating the immemorial quest of man's primitive speech.
I have thus touched, gentlemen, upon a few of the many subjects that crowd upon the mind for consideration on an occasion like this, - a few gleanings from a field which is passing rich in promise and possibility. It is a field that some of us have cultivated for many years, and yet have only scratched the surface ; and, if I have ventured to suggest or admonish, it is with the feeling that my own labors in this field are ere long about to end, and that I may not have another occasion. At no time in the history of the world has there, I trow, been gathered together such a body of devoted and capable workers in applied entomology. It marks an era in our calling, and, looking back at the progress of the past fifteen years, we may well ponder the possibilities of the next fifteen. They will be fruitful of grand results in proportion as we persistently and combinedly pursue the yet unsolved problems, and are not tempted to the immediate presentation of separate facts, which are so innumerable and so easily observed that their very wealth becomes an element of weakness. Epoch-making discoveries result only from this power of following up unswervingly any given problem or any fixed ideal. The kerosene emulsion ; the cyclone nozzle ; the history of Phylloxera vastatrix, of Phorodon humuli, of Vedalia cardinalis,- are illustrations in point: and, while we may not expect frequent results as striking or of as wide application as these, there is no end of important problems yet to be solved, and from the solution of which we may look for similar beneficial results. Applied entomology is often considered a sordid pursuit ; but it only becomes so when the object is sordid. When pursued with unselfish enthusiasm born of the love of investigation and the delight in benefiting our fellow-men, it is inspiring ; and there are few pursuits more deservedly so, considering the vast losses to our farmers from insect injury and the pressing need that the distressed husbandman has for every aid that can be given bim. Our work is elevating in its sympathies for the struggles and sufferings of others. Our standard should be high,- the pursuit of knowledge for the advancement of agriculture. No official entomologist should lower it by sordid aims. During the recent political campaign the farmer must have been sorely puzzled to know whether his interests needed protection or not. On the abstract question of tariff protection to his products, we, as entomologists, may no more agree than do the politicians, or than does the farmer himself ; but ours is a case of protection from in- jurious insects, and upon that there can nowhere be division of opinion. It is our duty to see that be gets it with as little tax for the means as possible. Gentlemen, I thank you.
Reviewing the floral relations of North and South America as illustrated in the foregoing instances, we may say that the phenomena of distribution agree fairly with the record of physical conditions which have succeeded each other and those which still exist, and upon which we might almost a priori have predicted an analogous set of distribution phenomena. In this relationship we may distinguish three categories of distribution: (1) Those due to the conditions of human civilization, commerce, etc. This has resulted in placing the same species in similar regions of both continents, as, for example, Fagonia cretica in Lower California and Chile; Munroa squarrosa, western plains of North America, plains of Argentine and high plateaus of Chile and Bolivia; Frankenia grandiflora, Southern California and Arizona, coast lands of Chile; Oxytheca dendroidea, Lastarricea chilensis, and Chorizanthe comrnmissuralis, all in Southern California and Western Chile. (2) Those due to the operation of natural causes acting unde present conditions of climate, geology, etc. Under this head may be cited such species as sida leprosa, hastata, anomala, Cienfugosia sulphurea, Spergulariaplattensis and, in general, elements of Gulf zone distribution; also certain elements which still find a pathway along the continental axis, including some alpine and mountain xerophilous genera. (3) The third category of distribution would include those phenomena due to geological and climatic changes acting through long periods. Under this head are included the elements of greatest significance in the relationsip of the North and South America floras. The endemic boreal flora of the Andes, the equally endemic boreal flora of the Mexican Cordilleras, and genera with sharply distinct species or sub-genera in the arid extra-tropical regions of both continents, which may be called remnant elements.
1. The basic principle in Mendel's discoveries is that of the purity of t. he germcells; in accordance with this a cross-bred animal or plant produces germ-cells bearing only one of each pair of characters in which its parents differ. From it follows the occurrence in the second and later hybrid generations of a definite number of forms in definite numerical proportions. 2. Mendel's principle of dominance is realized in the heredity of a considerable number of characters among both animals and plants. In accordance with this principle, hybrid offspring have visibly the character of only one parent or the other, though they transmit those of both parents. 3. In other cases the hybrid has a distinctive character of its own. This may approximate more or less closely the character of one parent or the other, or it may be entirely different from both. Frequently the distinctive hybrid character resembles a lost ancestral character. In some cases of this sort, as in coat-color of mammals, the hybrid character probably results from a recomibination of the characters seen in one or both parents, with certain Other characters latent (that is, recessive) in one parent or the other. 4. There have been observed the following exceptions to the principle of dominance, or to the principle of purity of the germ-cells, or to both: (a) Mosaic inheritance, in which a pair of characters ordinarily related as dominant and recessive occur in a balanced relationship, side by side in the hybrid individual and frequently in its germ-cells also. This balanced condition, once obtained, is usually stable under close breeding, but is readily disturbed by cross-breeding, giving place then to the normal dominance. (b) Stable (self-perpetuating) hybrid forms result from certain crosses. These constitute an exception to both the law of dominance and to that of purity of the germ-cells. For the hybrid is like neither parent, but the characters of both parents exist in a stable union in the mature germcells produced by the hybrid. (c) Coupling, i. e., complete correlation may exist between two or more characters, so that they form a compound unit not separable in heredity, at least in certain crosses. (d) Disintegration of characters apparently simple may take place in consequence of cross-breeding. (e) Departures from the expected ratios of dominants to recessives may be explained in some cases as due to inferior vigor, and so greater mortality, on the part of dominants or recessives respectively. (f) Cases of apparent reversal of dominance may arise from 'false hybridization' (induced lparthenogenesis). Possibly in other cases the determination of dominance rests with circumstances as yet unknown. 5. Mendel's principles strengthen the view that species arise by discontinuous variation. They explain why new types are especially variable, how one variation causes others, and why certain variations are so persistent in their Occurrence.
The following facts are those which are put forth through paleontological observation, for verification by others: 1. That many origins of new characters are through some internal action in heredity. 2. That many important adaptive characters arise determinately, definitely, but by extremely slow stages. 3. That degrees of similarity in such origins correspond with degrees of kinship. 4. That degrees of kinship also affect to a certain extent, but not absolutely the time of appearance, or the time of the origin, or the rate of evolution. 5. That such origins find expression not sponta. neously, or irrespective of conditions, or from purely internal mechanical causes, but through some entirely unknown and at present inconceivable relation to ontogeny (habit and use), to environment (external conditions), and to selection. 6. That if such origins do spring from internal hereditary principles, as they appear to do in many eases, slow origins (mutations of de Vries) may be simply due to the same law operating with a different velocity.
1. In tuberculosis meningitis there is a tuberculosis endarteritis characterized by the formation of intimal tubercles and a diffuse subendothelial, intimal proliferation due to implantation of tubercle bacili from the blood. From the endarteritis the infiltration may spread into the muscular coat and the adventitia, and the whole wall may undergo caseous and hyaline degeneration. 2. Tuberculous proliferation in the adventitia may invade the media and the intima, and the whole wall of the arterial segment may undergo degeneration. 3. The veins are constantly the seat of more or less extensive infiltration, which always results from adjacent extravascular or arterial foci. 4. The epithelioid cells of the subendothelial, tuberculous intimal See PDF for Structure proliferation are most likely derived from the subendothelial layer of connective tissue and not from the endothelial lining.
Toxin of sufficient strength to kill a 400-gramme guinea-pig in three days and a half in a dose of 0.cubic centimetre developed in suitable bouillon, contained in ordinary Erlenmeyer flasks, within a period of twenty-four hours. In such boullon the toxin reached its greatest strength in from four to seven days (0.005 cubic centimetre killing a 500-gramme guinea-pig in three days). This period of time covered that of the greatest growth of the bacilli, as shown both by the appearance of the culture and by the number of colonies developing an agar plates. The bodies of the diphtheria bacili did not at any time contain toxin in cosiderable amounts. The type of growth of the bacili and the rapidity and extent of the production of toxin depended more on the reaction of the bouillon than upon any other single factor. The best results were obtained in bouillon which, after being neutralized to litmus, had about seven cubic centimetres of normal soda solution added to each litre. An excessive amount of either acid or alkali prevented the development of toxin. Strong toxin was produced in bouillon containing peptone ranging from one to ten per cent. The strength of toxin averaged greater in the two and four-per-cent peptone solutions than in the one-percent. When the stage of acid reaction was brief and the degree of acidity probably slight, strong toxin developed while the culture bouillon was still acid; but when the stage of acid reaction was prolonged, little if any toxin was produced until just before the fluid became alkaline. Glucose is deleterious to the growth of the diphtheria bacillus and to the production of toxin when it is present in sufficient amounts to cause by its disintegration too great a degree of acidity in the fluid culture. When the acid resulting from decomposition of glucose is neutralized by the addition of alkali the diphtheria bacilus again grows abundantly. Glucose is not present, at least as a rule, in sufficient amounts in the meat as obtained from the New York butchers to prevent the rapid production of strong toxin if the bouillon is made sufficiently alkaline. In our experiments, when other conditions were similar, the strength of the toxin was in proportion to the virulence and vigour of growth of the bacillus employed.
The most important of this investigation has been the completion of various improvements in the construction and use of the plethysmograph, by means of which numerous errors attending the use of the instrument have been eliminated. The results of the work show that all olfactory sensations, so far as they produce any effect through the vasomotor system, tend to diminish the volume of the arm, and therefore presumably cause a congestion of the brain. Whenever the stimulation occassions an increase in the volume of the arm, as sometimes happens, it seems to be due to acceleration of the heart rate, which, of course, tends also to increase the supply of blood to the brain. The of odours varies in extent with different individuals, and with the same individual at different times. It was most marked in subjects sensitive to odours. Irritant vapours, such as formic acid, have a marked effect in the same direction-that is, they cause a strong diminution in the volume of the arm. The experiments give no support to the view that pleasant sensations are accompanied by a diminution of the See PDF for Structure blood supply to the brain and unpleasant sensations by the reverse efeect. In all my experiments mental work caused a marked and prolonged diminution in the volume of the arm. This vasomotor effect was sometimes preceded by a transitory increase in the volume of the arm caused by acceleration of heart rate.
The pigmentary granules of the negro's skin and hair can be freed in several ways from the cells in which they are lodged and collected in any desired amount. As thus obtained, these granules are found to be insoluble in dilute alkalies, dilute hydrochloric acid (hot or cold), alcohol, or other organic solvents when applied in the order named. If, after they have been subjected to the action of dilute hydrochloric acid, they are again treated with dilute alkalies, they are found to give up their pigment, and, on the continued application of heat, the granules dissolve entirely in the alkaline solution, leaving only an insignificant residue. The pigmentary granules are composed of a colourless ground substance or substratum, a pigment, and much inorganic matter. Their inorganic constituents, as thus far determined, are calcium, magnesium, iron, and silicic, phosphoric, and sulphuric acids; and these constituents possibly play an important part in the deposition and fixation of the colouring matter in the granules. The pigment isolated from the granules, and sufficiently freed from adherent inorganic matter, contains only the merest trace of iron-so little, in fact, that we must think of it when entirely pure as free of iron. Heating the isolated pigment with barium hydrate at a temperature of 260 degrees C. entirely frees it from the closely adherent ground substance, and it is then found that the vapours of pyrrol are no longer emitted when it is subjected to dry distillation, and the odour of burnt feathers is no longer discerned, although nitrogen is still present. We can not conclude as the result of our work that the pigment is a derivative of haemoglobin; it seems to us more probable that it is ultimately derived from the proteids of the parenchymatous juices. The total quantity of soluble pigment in the skin of a negro of average size is found to weigh about 1 gramme; the weight of the pigmentary granules is about 3.3 grammes, if we are right in our assumption that they contain sixty-five per cent of water and five per cent of mineral constituents in their natural state in the epidermis. The pigments of the epidermis and hair of the negro are very likely identical. In the present state of our knowledge we can only say that it seems highly probable that the pigment of the negro's hair is not different from the dark pigment found in the hair of the white races, and we may infer that the pigment of the black skin differs only in amount and not in kind from that deposited in the skin of the white man.
1. All the features peculiar to the gross cysts of the thyroid gland which possess fluid contents appear to indicate that they are essentially of haemorrhagic origin. 2. While these gross cysts would seem more especially to occur in glands which already present the features of parenchymatous goitre, the theory of Wölfler that they originate as a consequence of spontaneous rupture of the vesicles is unsatisfactory. 3. It would seem more probable that these large cysts are due to rupture, traumatic or otherwise, of some of the vessels of the organ. The frequent signs of small haemorrhages in cases of parenchymatous goitre without evidence of associated gross change in the surrounding vesicles, the structure of the organ and its exposed position, all appear to favour this view.
THE DEDUCTIONS THAT MAY BE DRAWN FROM THE RESULTS OF THESE EXPERIMENTS ARE AS FOLLOWS: That the normal vital resistance of rabbits to infection by streptococcus pyogenes (erysipelatos) is markedly diminished through the influence of alcohol when given daily to the stage of acute intoxication. That a similar, though by no means so conspicuous, diminution of resistance to infection and intoxication by the bacillus coli communis also occurs in rabbits subjected to the same influences. And that, while in alcoholized rabbits inoculated in various ways with staphylococcus pyogenes aureus, individual instances of lowered resistance are observed, still it is impossible to say from these experiments that in general a marked difference is noticed between alcoholized and non-alcoholized animals as regards infection by this particular organism. It is interesting to note that the results of inoculation of alcoholized rabbits with the erysipelas coccus correspond in a way with clinical observations on human beings addicted to the excessive use of alcohol when infected by this organism. In the course of the work an effort was made to determine if, through the oxidation of alcohol in the tissues to acids of the corresponding chemical group, the increase of susceptibility could be referred to a diminution in the alkalinity of the blood as a result of the presence of such acids. The number of experiments thus far made on this point is too small to justify dogmatic statements, but from what we have gathered there is but little evidence in support of this view. Throughout these experiments, with few exceptions, it will be seen that the alcoholized animals not only showed the effects of the inoculations earlier than did the non-alcoholized rabbits, but in the case of the streptococcus inoculations the lesions produced (formation of miliary abscesses) were much more pronounced than are those that usually follow inoculation with this organism. With regard to the predisposing influence of the alcohol, one is constrained to believe that it is in most cases the result of structural alterations consequent upon its direct action on the tissues, though in a number of the animals no such alteration could be made out by macroscopic examination. I am inclined, however, to the belief, in the light of the work of Berkley and of Friedenwald, done under the direction of Prof. Welch, in the Pathological Laboratory of the Johns Hopkina University, that a closer study of the tissues of these animals would have revealed in all of them structural changes of such a nature as to indicate disturbances of important vital functions of sufficient gravity to fully account for the loss of normal resistance. The conspicuous influence of the alcohol on the gastric mucous membrane in many of these animals, with the consequent disturbance of nutrition, is undoubtedly the explanation of the marked loss in body weight that was observed in many of the animals employed in these experiments. In this light the susceptibility induced by alcohol to excess is somewhat analogous to that induced by starvation, where we see the resistance of animals to particular forms of infection very markedly diminished.
The glanders nodule in the class of cases studied by us is in no sense analogous to the miliary tubercle in its histogenesis, and our studies afford no support to Baumgarten's views. The primary effect of the bacillus of glanders on a tissue we found to be not a production of epithelioid cells, which undergo necrosis and invasion by leucocytes, as happens in the cases in which the bacillus of tuberculosis is concerned, but to be the production of primary necrosis of the tissue, followed by inflammatory exudation, often of a suppurative character. Degenerative changes rapidly ensue in the inflammatory products. These conclusions are in harmony with the observations of Tedeschi, above referred to.
The purpura accompanying the two foregoing cases of sarcoimatosis would seem to find its explanation in the coexistence of several factors, the main feature being an involvement of the vascular system by the sarcomatous elements. There existed in Case I a direct lesion of the vessel wall whereby the sarcoma cells invaded directly the various coats, and were found mainly between the intima and the adventitia, dissecting their way, as it were, along these tracts in the vessel walls. There was further an extensive involvement of the perivascular lymphatics, from which point, indeed, it would seem that the sarcoma cells had invaded the walls of the vessels themselves. In Case II, moreover, not only was there a definite invasion of the lymph spaces near the vessels, but, furthermore, there was undoubted evidence of the existence of emboli of sarcoma cells in the lumina of the blood vessels; and in the immediate vicinity of such conditions haemorrhages were invariably found. While some vessels, and indeed a great many, were quite free from such emboli, in others the lumina were completely occluded by spindle cells, so as to preclude the possibility that these were merely a collection of desquamated endothelial cells, such as is frequently found as the result of post-mortem changes. That such an embolic condition can exist is by no means an unreasonable supposition, and, while it is generally recognised that multiple sarcomata are usually made up of small round cells, in this case we have an undoubted example of sarcomatosis of the spindle-celled variety. There are numerous instances of this " embolic purpura," as it may be called, especially in French and German literature, the condition being associated with rheumatism, valvular lesions of the heart, and other diseases which induce directly or indirectly the formation of emboli. Krauss, Gimard, Leloir, and others have insisted with considerable emphasis on the embolic origin of many purpuric conditions, and in some instances they have verified their observations by histological examination. Leloir assumes that, in addition to the presence of the ordinary emboli and the changes in the vessel walls with desquamative endarteritis, the blood itself may be much altered chemically, and that in the cachectic conditions clots may be thrown down from the circulating blood and be carried onward to form capillary emboli, with resulting haemorrhagic infarctions. Krogerer, some ten years ago, in examining the skin removed from patients with symptomatic purpura, found definite thromboses in the smaller veins, and even in the arteries. According to his view, the alterations in the vessel walls gave rise to slowed circulation and tendency to thrombosis, bringing about a liability to haemorrhages. His plates bear out his theories regarding the thrombi, many of which show considerable organization. But a careful examination of the purpuric areas shows further that a mere invasion of the vascular system by sarcoma cells can not explain all the various blood effusions present. On examining the skin, for instance, in those areas where large irregular haemorrhages had occurred, there was but little evidence of vascular invasion, while the emboli, on the other hand, seemed to exist mainly in the localized smaller and more circumscribed patches. One must therefore conclude that in such instances a combination of factors will alone afford a rational explanation of the purpura, and that in the general condition of the patient we shall find another cause for the enormous effusions of blood. In both of our cases there were high fever, cachexia, and a rapid progressive asthenia, all being the results of a sarcomatosis, and implying also grave alterations in the composition of the blood. From this we may infer an altered condition of the vessel walls, and hence probably a combination of circumstances sufficient to explain the incidence of haemorrhage. The raised cutaneous nodules in our second case, some of which were haemorrhagic, can not be regarded as pure sarcomatous metastases, for on microscopic examination they merely revealed haemorrhage or necrosis, or both, and sometimes plugging of the vessels. There was nowhere in these nodules evidence of new growths. Such elevations, then, must have been produced rather by a temporary serous or cellular exudation coincident with or following upon the haemorrhage-a probability which is emphasized by the fact that during the last days of the patient's illness many of the nodules diminished in size. Whether the oedema and infiltration were secondary to the embolic process in the subcutaneous vessels or whether they were merely coincident with the haemorrhage would be difficult to decide. The ringlike spots, however, are of special interest, inasmuch as it has been shown that they have been present in more than one case of sarcoma. It is not impossible that such spots may be definitely related either to the embolic processes or to a direct invasion of the cutaneous vessels, though, so far as we know, there do not exist any experimental proofs to bear out such a theory. From what has been said, however, it is evident that the cutaneous vessels were plugged during the last few days of the illness, at a time when the walls of the smaller vessels and capillaries were already greatly enfeebled. The result of the embolic formation may therefore mean a decided deficiency in the supply of nutriment to the involved area, the collateral circulation naturally being poor under the circumstances. As soon, then, as the vessels had become plugged, the surrounding blood supply would be poured in to a limited extent, and, on meeting the enfeebled vessels, might possibly break through their thin walls, thus producing a zone of haemorrhage around the area deprived of its normal nutrition. In other words, the condition may be regarded as in many respects analogous to that presented in embolic infarcts in regions with end arteries, central necrosis with peripheral congestion and haemorrhage being induced, the latter being chiefly limited to the outer zone of the necrotic area. The cutaneous vessels under such circumstances may be regarded as end arteries in a functional sense, since the collateral circulation would be so diminished under the altered conditions that no complete nourishment could be afforded to the area supplied normally by the plugged vessel. Von Recklinghausen has directed especial attention to the occurrence of cutaneous haemorrhages following embolic or thrombotic occlusion of peripheral arteries. The possibility of some toxic condition as a factor in the production of the purpura in our cases may also be suggested; but while we would not exclude this possibility, we are unable to find any positive evidence in its favour. Focal necroses, which are often associated with toxic and infectious processes, were present only in direct association with the haemorrhages, and were not distributed in the liver, spleen, and kidneys in the manner characteristic of toxic infections. Nevertheless the absence of these necroses does not exclude the possibility of the existence of some form of toxaemia. Infection demonstrable by bacteriological examination was absent, and there is no reason to regard our cases as allied to the infectious purpuras. The thermic theory suggested by Fagge at all events finds no place in the production of the multiple tumours in our cases, inasmuch as in each instance extensive visceral growths had given rise to the metastases.
a. The blood of apparently normal animals undergoes considerable variations within physiological limits. b. After a loss of blood the regeneration is more rapid if there has been a transfusion of an artificial serum. c. Regeneration after transfusion is less rapid during the first half of the regeneration period than during the second half. d. The regenerative processes once stimulated into activity carry the blood, qualitatively, considerably beyond the established normal. (See Plate XXXIII.) Otto (2) observed a similar phenomenon. e. The quantity of haemoglobin per volume of red blood-corpuscles is not constant. f. The volume of red blood-corpuscles varies as the product of the average volume of individual corpuscles and the number of corpuscles per unit volume. (V proportional, variant v x n). g. When the number of the corpuscles increases the size decreases, and conversely, (n proportional, variant(1/2)). h. The quantity of haemoglobin varies in general with the number of red blood-corpuscles per unit volume. (Hb. proportional, variant n).
1. Children of the two sexes differ very little in the character of their respiratory movements. 2. Between girls and women and boys and men there is little or no difference in respiratory type. 3. Childbearing does not permanently affect respiration. 4. The natural type of respiration, for both sexes is one in which the movement is fairly equally balanced between chest and abdomen, the abdominal being somewhat in excess. 5. In typical unconstricted individuals the chest contributes about the same bulk of air as does the abdomen. 6. Constricting dress causes preponderance of thoracic movement in ratio to its restriction of abdominal movement and to the sensitiveness of the nervous co-ordination.
THE RESULTS OBTAINED IN THE PRECEDING EXPERIMENTS MAY BE BRIEFLY SUMMARIZED AS FOLLOWS: 1. Nucleohiston does not protect against a separate and subcutaneous injection of tetanus toxin, diphtheria toxin, hog-cholera bacillus, or anthrax bacillus. 2. Mixtures of nucleohiston and either tetanus toxin or diphtheria toxin lose their specific toxic action-the latter much more rapidly than the former. Animals that recover after inoculation of such mixtures are not rendered immune. 3. In a mixture of nucleohiston and anthrax bacillus the latter is unaffected, even after the lapse of eleven days. 4. The destruction of specific toxins in a solution of nucleohiston, though in part due to sodium carbonate, is probably chiefly due to the nucleohiston. 5. Histon does not protect against a separate and subcutaneous injection of tetanus toxin, diphtheria toxin, hog-cholera bacillus, or anthrax bacillus. 6. In a mixture of histon and diphtheria toxin the latter is destroyed in a few minutes. This action is in part, if not wholly, due to the acidity of the histon solution. Similar mixtures of closely related bodies, serum globulin or albumoses, in Witte's pepton, give analogous results. The animals that recover from such inoculations are not rendered immune. Histon does not destroy the tetanus toxin as readily as the diphtheria toxin. 7. Histon possesses decided and marked toxic properties which are not due to the hydrochloric acid present.
I. The mean total time taken from 450 experiments on sixteen subjects was found to be 0.0420 second. II. Natural winks occurring very shortly before the record was taken had no influence. III. The reflex time was found to vary in different individuals, the limits of the mean times being 0.0351 and 0.0491 second. For any given individual there was a close correspondence between averages of sets of experiments obtained under similar conditions. In the case of one man this was true of sets of experiments taken a year apart. Sex has no influence. IV. Apprehension seems to shorten the time.
THE CONCLUSIONS WHICH HAVE BEEN REACHED BY THE SERIES OF EXPERIMENTS RECORDED IN THE PRESENT MEMOIR ARE: First. Lowered arterial pressure has a comparatively feeble effect upon the respiration, but when the pressure falls sufficiently, respiratory depression does occur. Second. Even excessive lowering of blood pressure primarily stimulates the vaso-motor centre, the sensibility of the centre being evidently necessary to the automatic regulation of the circulation. Third. The circulation recovers itself more slowly after profound etherization than after a like chloroform narcosis. Fourth. It is possible for ether as well as chloroform to produce death some hours after the cessation of its administration, at a time when the cerebrum has long freed itself from distinct evidences of the narcotic, so that consciousness and intellectual action have been restored. In applying these conclusions to the subject of practical anaesthesia it is evident that the depression of the circulation produced by chloroform has effect upon the respiratory centres only when the pressure has fallen very low, and whilst it may be a factor in the production of respiratory failure during chloroformization, the failure must be chiefly due to the direct influence exercised by the drug upon the respiratory centres. Clinical experience shows that nausea and general depression are more pronounced after the use of ether than after the use of chloroform, a difference which is strongly insisted upon by the advocates of chloroform as an important agent in favor of that anaesthetic. Our research confirms clinical observation, and experimentally shows that the depression of the circulation produced by ether is more permanent than that caused by chloroform; the reason probably being the large amount of ether which is necessary to produce profound narcosis, with lowering of the arterial pressure; an amount so large that it can neither be burned up in the system nor yet eliminated in the time which would be necessary for the much smaller amount of chloroform to be gotten rid of after chloroformization.
The experiments described in Part IV of this paper show that in whatever manner the problem of the relation of the vagus to the accelerators is approached, whether the accelerators are stimulated during a stimulation of the vagus, or the vagus during a stimulation of the accelerators, or both are stimulated simultaneously, either for a short or for a longer period, the result is the same, viz., the effect upon the rate of the heart is determined entirely by the relative strength of the stimuli applied to the two nerves. If the stimuli are of approximately the same strength, as judged by the effect of stimulating the nerves separately, the rate of the heart is but slightly affected; if the stimulus applied to the vagus is the stronger, the heart is slowed; if it is weaker, the heart is accelerated. In all cases the result of stimulating the two nerves simultaneously is approximately the algebraic sum of the results of stimulating them separately; sometimes the inhibitory effect slightly predominates, but not more frequently than does the accelerator effect. Moreover, the two nerves may be stimulated simultaneously for a considerable period of time without either completely overcoming the effect of the other. Thus as far as their effect upon the rate of the ventricular beat is concerned, the vagus and accelerator nerves seem to be purely antagonistic; the statement that a minimal stimulation of the one can completely overcome a maximal stimulation of the other is undoubtedly incorrect, and the hypotheses as to the mode of action of these nerves upon the heart, based upon this statement, lose their chief support.
Colostrum corpuscles are not always found in so-called colostrum milk; when they are present, the percentage of proteids is higher; as they disappear, the proteid percentage drops. The color of colostrum milk is yellow; this color is especially marked in negroes' milk (observed in four cases not included in this report). The reaction of colostrum milk is alkaline. The specific gravity varies from 1024 to 1034. This variation is chiefly due to the variation in the amount of fat present.
In summing up the contents of the preceding pages it may be stated that the action of digitalis has been divided into two stages according to the changes evinced by the ventricles under its influence; of these the first is characterized by marked inhibitory action together with modification of the cardiac muscle, while in the second the inhibitory action is less marked and the muscular action becomes the more prominent feature. The inhibitory action is due to direct stimulation by this series of the pneumogastric centrally in the medulla oblongata and peripherally in the heart. The extent to which the inhibitory mechanism is stimulated varies in different animals and with different members of the digitalis series. The muscular action of small quantities betrays itself in a tendency to increase the extent of the contraction, while in some cases the degree of relaxation reached in diastole is also lessened by it. In larger quantities the series increases the irritability of the cardiac muscle very considerably, and the spontaneous rhythm of the ventricles therefore becomes developed. Through the interaction of these two factors in the first stage the rhythm of the whole heart is slowed, the contraction of the ventricle is more complete, and the diastolic relaxation is generally increased, although it may be unchanged or lessened. The systolic pressure is increased and the fall from maximum to minimum pressure is slower than normal owing to the increased completeness and longer duration of systole (Rolleston). The auricles generally contract with less force and may relax more completely than normally. Sometimes, however, their contractions also are more complete than before the injection of the drug. This latter condition generally precedes the diminution of the force of the auricular contraction. This variation of the effects of digitalis in the auricle explains the changes in intra-auricular pressure noted by Kaufmann. The contraction volume of the ventricles is always much increased, and the output per unit of time is generally augmented, and this together with the contraction of the peripheral arterioles causes an increase in the tension in the systemic circulation, an acceleration of the circulation, and possibly a temporary increase in the pressure in the great veins and in the auricle and ventricle in diastole (Kaufmann). The pressure in the pulmonary artery is practically unaffected by some members of the series, while by others it is considerably increased. This difference in the reaction of the pulmonary circulation is due to the varying extent to which these drugs act on the peripheral arteries and not to any difference in their action on the two sides of the heart. If the inhibitory action be very strongly marked the slowing of the heart may be extreme, the ventricles assuming their own spontaneous rhythm and all connection with the auricles being lost. While the contraction volume of the ventricle is still greater than normal, their output per unit of time may become less than normal, the aortic tension therefore fall and the rapidity of the circulation be lessened. The ventricles maintain their association throughout, and probably the rhythm of the two auricles also remains equal. The ventricular rhythm, however, becomes irregular owing to the variation in the duration of the diastolic pause. The auricles may cease altogether in diastole, or may continue to beat with a slower or faster rhythm than the ventricles. During the second stage the rhythm of the heart becomes accelerated owing to the increased irritability of the heart muscle. The ventricle tends to assume a rapid spontaneous rhythm, while the auricular rhythm is also quicker than in the first stage. When these two rhythms interfere by the passage of impulses across the auriculo-ventricular boundary in either direction, irregularity of the heart is produced, generally bearing a distinctly periodic character. The ventricles continue to maintain their common rhythm, while the auricles and ventricles may contract at quite different rates. The two ventricles, however, do not necessarily contract with equal force, and the contractions of one may present periodic variations in strength, while those of the other may be almost perfectly uniform. The contractions of the auricles vary in the same way as regards each other and the ventricles. The inhibitory nerves are no longer able to slow the ventricular rhythm, but may affect the completeness of systole and diastole in the ordinary way. The auricular contractions can still be lessened in force and possibly be abolished by their stimulation, and the impulses passing between the auricle and ventricle may therefore be blocked and regularity of the heart produced by powerful inhibition. The irregularity of the contractions is therefore due indirectly to the increased irritability of the cardiac muscle and the acceleration must be attributed to the same cause. An extreme phase of this stage produced by the interference of the rhythms is a temporary standstill of one of the chambers, generally the auricle. The irregularity leads to a lessened efficiency of the work of the heart. The output varies extremely in successive observations and the contraction volume of every individual beat may differ. The various chambers often show a tendency to dilate during this stage. The blood pressure in the systemic arteries at first remains high, in fact may be higher than in the first stage owing to the increased rapidity of the heart rhythm, but afterwards falls continuously as the periodic variations become shorter in duration. The auricles generally cease contracting before the ventricles, but not invariably. There is no fixed order in the cessation of the ventricles or auricles. Each division comes to a standstill in a position somewhat nearer diastole than systole and then passes into delirium and dilates to the fullest extent.
FROM OUR OBSERVATIONS I THINK THE FOLLOWING PROPOSITIONS ARE JUSTIFIED: (1) All muscular movements are made up of a series of elementarycontractions and relaxations in alternation, which may be appreciable as tremor in conditions of both health and disease. (2) The differences between different tremors are of degree rather than of kind, i. e. no one form of tremor is distinctive of any one disease or group of diseases. (3) No definite relation exists between one form of tremor and any other. (4) The frequency of movement is in inverse ratio to the amplitnde and vice versâ. (5) Habitual movements are performed with greater freedom from tremor than unusual movements. (6) There is no material difference between the movements of the two sides of the body, except as related to Proposition (5).
THE CONCLUSIONS AT WHICH WE ARRIVE ARE THE FOLLOWING: 1. Nodular enlargement of the tube can be caused by a number of different pathological conditions. 2. Clinical examination does not enable us to make a diagnosis of the pathological condition existing in an individual case of nodule of the tube. 3. The diagnosis of the nature of a tubal nodule can be made only with the microscope. 4. The conditions causing nodular enlargement of the tube are congenital or acquired, non-inflammatory or inflammatory. 5. Any one of these conditions can exist without the production of nodules. 6. The nodules can be found in all parts of the tube and-taking the peculiar anatomy of each part of the tube into account-show the same structure. 7. The enlargement can be caused by epithelial or epithelioid formations, connective or muscular tissue, by round-cell infiltrations or combinations of two or more of these. 8. The epithelial formations originate in the epithelium of a. the tubal mucous membrane (salpingitis pseudo-follicularis, adenomyoma originating in the tubal epithelium). b. the accessory tubes (intraparietal parasalpinx and hydro-parasalpinx). c. remnants of the Wolffian body (adenomyoma). 9. The epithelioid formations originate in the peritoneal endothelium (peritoneal growths under "relative heterotopy"). 10. The excess of formation of connective tissue is a consequence of inflammatory conditions of the tubal wall (salpingitis interstitialis, Zweifel). 11. The hypertrophy of the muscular tissue is a. non-inflammatory (adenomyoma). b. consequent upon inflammation-Kaltenbach's case (23). 12. The accumulations of round cells are direct evidence of inflammation: a. non-specific (salpingitis interstitialis disseminata, salpingitis abscedens); or b. specific (salpingitis tuberculosa or s. gonorrhoica). 13. The epithelioid formations can occur wherever pseudo-membranes cover organs lined with a serous coat. 14. Extra-uterine pregnancy (abdominal or tubal) produces epithelioid formations by causing pseudo-membranes to form-not by any irritation peculiar to the pregnancy.
1. The cause of the rhythmic contraction of the ventricle lies within the ventricle itself. 2. The cause of the rhythmic contraction is not a single, localized, co-ordination centre; the co-ordination mechanism, whatever it may be, is present in all parts of the ventricle. 3. The integrity of the whole ventricle is not essential to the coordinated contractions of a part of the ventricle. 4. The apex of the mammalian heart possesses spontaneous, rhythmic contractility. 5. Assuming that the general belief in the absence of nerve cells from the apical part of the ventricle is correct, these experiments demonstrate that nerve cells are not essential to spontaneous, long-continued, co-ordinated contractions of the ventricle.
1. The claim of L. Pfeiffer that small granular amoeboid bodies are present in the blood of vaccinated children and calves, and in the blood from cases of variola, during the stage of fever is confirmed. A nucleus has not been positively made out in any of these bodies. 2. Granular amoeboid bodies, having a diameter about one-third that of a red blood cell, appear, also, in the blood of the monkey during the active stage of vaccinia and disappear with the decline of the local inflammation. 3. A body of like appearance, granulation and size may occasionally be found in the normal blood of monkeys and children. 4. Pale amoeboid bodies, containing a few dark pigment-like granules, are present in the blood from cases of variola and in the blood of the variolated monkey. Bodies of like appearance may occasionally be found in the blood of vaccinated children and monkeys.
Assuming the typical colon bacillus and the typical typhoid bacillus to represent the types of this group that present the greatest divergences in biological peculiarities, we conclude, as others also have done, that there is a series of closely related forms that may be regarded as intermediate or transitional and which serve to establish a biological relationship, either near or remote, between these two typical members. From our own studies we are inclined to regard the typical colon bacillus as the type of this group, for the reason that its functional equilibrium, as observed in the intestine, is so permanent a quality that it may readily be perpetuated under what is ordinarily regarded as favorable artificial circumstances, and that with the continuance of such conditions there is no conspicuous tendency on the part of this organism to deviate from what we regard as its norm; whereas, on the other hand, with all the other members of this group with which we have worked, there is not only a lack of uniformity in the adjustment of the functions, but such as exists is readily disturbed under artificial environment; though it must be borne in mind that even with the typical colon bacillus we have also shown functional modifications to be possible under particular conditions. When the members of the colon group are cultivated under circumstances favorable to the development of both the function of fermentation and that of proteolysis, fermentation invariably takes precedence and no evidence of proteolysis is manifested until after fermentation has ceased. The cultivation of all the members of the colon group under circumstances that favor the development of one function, viz. that of proteolysis, at the expense of another, viz. that of fermentation, results first in an apparent increase of vigor; but this is of temporary duration and is quickly followed by the decline and death of the cell. The result of this increased activity of the proteolytic function is the formation of much larger amounts of indol by typical colon cultures than has ever been obtained by us by any other method. By the method of experimentation through which we were enabled to accentuate the proteolytic activity of the typical colon bacillus, as caused by an increase of indol formation, we have also induced the function of indol formation not only in atypical colon bacilli that had been devoid of it, but in every specimen of typical typhoid bacilli to which we had access as well. We feel justified in regarding one of the differential tests between the typhoid and colon bacillus, namely that of indol formation on the part of the latter and the absence of this function from the former, as of questionable value, for the reason, as shown above, that by particular methods of cultivation indol production has been shown to accompany the development of a number of specimens that we have every reason to regard as genuine typhoid bacilli. As a result of our own experiments, together with the observations of others, there can be no doubt that the bacillus coli communis at times possesses pathogenic properties, and that by artificial methods of treatment it may often be brought from a condition of benignity to one of virulence. The spleen of a typhoid patient has always been regarded as the only trustworthy source from which to obtain the typical typhoid bacillus. While we believe this to be true, still our investigations show that other members of the colon group may also be present in this viscus; in fact, from such spleens we have isolated practically all of the varieties of this group with which we are acquainted. From our experience, the value of the serum test for the differentiation of typhoid and colon bacilli would seem to be questionable. We are inclined, however, to attribute the irregularities recorded above as due more to the method of application than to defects of the principles involved; for, as stated, by the use of dried blood, as in our experiments, it is not possible to make the test with constant and accurate, or even approximately accurate, dilutions of the serum. Our irregularities may be in part due to this defect. We therefore lay less stress upon this than upon the other features of our work.
The action of aconitin on the dog's heart, therefore, seems to consist in: 1. A stimulation of the inhibitory mechanism, especially of the centres in the medulla oblongata. 2. An increase in the irritability of the muscle of the auricle and the ventricle, which leads to independent contractions of one or both of these divisions and culminates in fibrillary contractions in the ventricle. The first of these is the only effect seen in the therapeutic use of the drug, and aconitin may, therefore, be considered to be indicated when it is desirable to stimulate the inhibitory centre without acting on the heart muscle. Of course it has a further effect on the circulation through the stimulation of the vaso-motor centre, but this would appear to be of minor importance.
THE RESULTS AND CONCLUSIONS OF THE ABOVE INVESTIGATION ARE: 1. The term glio-sarcoma should be dropped, as unscientific and misleading in its significance. 2. The problems regarding neuroglia demand varied methods for their adequate study. 3. With all the means at our command, the absolute determination of the relation of cells and fibres in individual cases remains difficult and at times impossible. 4. No criterion has yet been offered to determine a fundamental distinction between glioma and sarcoma (Stroebe); and secondly, between glioma and so-called gliosis (Weigert). 5. The development of neuroglia in all probability is from cells with protoplasmic processes to cells with differentiated and independent fibres. 6. Herein lies a possible reconciliation of the conflicting views concerning the ultimate structure of human neuroglia.
1. It must be accepted from a comparison between the histological changes described in the focal necroses due to abrin and ricin, diphtheria, eclampsia, blood-serum intoxication, typhoid fever, lobar pneumonia and glanders, and those described here in three cases of tuberculosis, that the last are also instances of focal necrosis. 2. It may be claimed that the areas of necrosis in the three cases of tuberculosis had their origin in ischaemia, for the reason that they were numerous in the spleen and were not found in the kidney. Against such an explanation of their causation are the facts: that other forms of necrosis affect frequently the spleen and seldom the kidney; that thrombosis of vessels or any fixed relation of the areas in the spleen to blood-vessels could not be established; that the tubercle bacilli were invariably present; and lastly and of no slight importance, that these necroses were all present in cases of marked marasmus. 3. That the areas of necrosis in these three cases might be phenomena resulting from a mixed infection with pyogenic bacteria is possible, but no groups, colonies or even single bodies could be found which answered to the requirements in shape or staining properties for such bacteria. Even were it the case that the focal necroses here presented are the histological lesions of a septicaemia occurring as a complication of tuberculosis, the presence of the bacillus of tuberculosis in the areas of necrosis would still require explanation. 4. Lastly, it is not unreasonable to suppose that a diminished resistance on the part of the tissues incidental to marasmus is an important factor in the production of these necrotic lesions.
Semi-solid culture media, and more especially media rendered semi-solid by temperatures of from 30 degrees to 40 degrees C., seem to have an important bearing in the differentiation of bacterial species, particularly those presenting various degrees of motility. In such media not only the effect of differences in consistence on the motility of an organism may be noted, but the effect produced by various chemicals and nutrient ingredients on the growth and motility may be readily observed. By systematically varying the constituents of such media it has been possible to produce a medium in which the behavior of Bacillus typhosus differentiates it from the various members of the colon group; and also to produce a medium in which the colonies of Bacillus typhosus assume a form which distinguishes them from the colonies of the colon bacilli in plate cultures. Bacillus typhosus alone of all the organisms investigated during these experiments has displayed both the power of giving rise to thread-forming colonies in the plating medium and that of the uniform clouding of the tube medium, hence these two characters may prove to be of great value in the identification of this organism. The practical application of the use of these media has led to the ready detection of Bacillus typhosus and its isolation from the stools of patients suffering from typhoid fever. No suspected water has been subjected to test, but from the investigation of artificially infected tap-water the media here described may be assumed to have an application in the detection of Bacillus typhosus in such waters.
1. The proteids consisted of albumins and globulins, varying in quantity between the extremes of .9010 grm. and .2592 grm. in the 24 hours, but usually between .7 and .37 grm., the average being .5317 grm. 2. The quantity of the proteids varies directly as the urea, inversely as the external temperature. The relation between the quantity of urine and the quantity of proteid is not constant. The quantity of the proteida is little affected by diuretics; it tends to be increased by certain drugs that act upon the circulation. It is lessened during sleep. It is apt to suffer a sudden temporary increase, returning as suddenly to the usual average. For this phenomenon we have no explanation. 3. From .5449 to .6616 grm. of coagulable proteids a day (.0079 to .0094 grm. per kilo of body-weight) may be excreted through the urine for an indefinite time by an otherwise healthy individual without damage to either kidneys or organism.
From the foregoing description of the histological changes in the leptomeninx it is quite evident that we are dealing with a chronic, stationary, healing form of tuberculous inflammation. This statement is substantiated, in the first place, by the clinical history. The only reasonable interpretation of the symptoms would establish the duration of the process as four months. The imaginable contingency that there existed first a meningeal syphilitic lesion that was dispersed by the iodide of potassium only to be followed by a tuberculous infection is so remote and unlikely that it need not be discussed. At all events the tuberculous leptomeningitis, which presented a typical distribution, began insidiously, existed at times in a latent condition, and pursued a very anomalous course, marked by a relative mildness of all the symptoms, and thus it came about that when an apparent or real improvement followed the administration of iodide of potassium able observers were induced to make an erroneous diagnosis. Death occurred as a result of an intercurrent infection. The long duration of the process is also shown, anatomically, by the thick layer of firm, translucent and gelatinous material that matted together the structures at the base, and also by the evident adhesions between the pia and the brain. The histological examination furnishes proof positive of the correctness of the conclusion in regard to the peculiar character of this process because it shows: (1) That the tuberculous proliferation is uniform in development and has reached nearly the same stage of evolution throughout the entire extent of the leptomeninx involved; it is not a process that has advanced by exacerbations and irregular extensions; the lesions are, generally speaking, of nearly the same age everywhere and must have begun at about the same time. (2) That only a very limited degree of caseous degeneration is present, pointing to an early arrest of the activity of the tubercle bacillus or to a very decided diminution or attenuation of its virulence. (3) That the subendothelial intimal proliferations of epithelioid cells, so generally found in acute tuberculous leptomeningitis,* have in this case become more or less completely changed into distinct fibrous tissue in which but very slight, if any, direct evidence of its tuberculous origin can be found. It is only by recognizing that the chronic endarteritis is most marked in correspondence with the most advanced adventitial tuberculous changes, and by finding an imperfect, much altered giant cell in one district of intimal thickening, that we were able to establish the direct kinship of the endovascular changes with those of the pia in general. (4) That acute inflammatory changes, in the form of emigration of polymorphonuclear leucocytes and of fibrinous exudation, are entirely absent in all parts of the district involved. The presence of a turbid serous fluid is of course not at all inconsistent with the view that the anatomical changes are of long duration. (5) That the granulation tissue present is, in general, undergoing fibrillation and contains a rich supply of enabryonal capillary vessels as well as of larger blood-vessels of evidently new formation. The absence of any considerable extent of polymorphonuclear leucocytic infiltration in this tissue has already been referred to. The cells in the granulation tissue correspond to the cells of embryonal or formative connective tissue. Vacuolation is rarely present. (6) That the unusually large number of giant cells present are remarkably free from evidences of necrosis and degeneration of the character ordinarily observed in tuberculous proliferations, that they do not contain in demonstrable form tubercle bacilli, and that the majority of the giant cells seem to be separating into individual cells and smaller masses often with, but sometimes also without, evidences of nuclear disintegration. The possibility that these phenomena may signify fusion instead of the sundering of cells will be discussed below. For these reasons there can be no doubt that the general claim that we are dealing with an instance of chronic, healing tuberculous meningitis must be regarded as established beyond dispute. The growth of tubercle bacilli in the glycerine-agar tubes, inoculated with the fluid from the pial meshes, and the demonstration of tubercle bacilli, though in very small numbers, between the cells of the embryonal tissue, furnish the positive evidence that we are actually dealing with a tuberculous process due to living and not to dead bacilli. The degree of virulence of the cultures of tubercle bacilli was, unfortunately perhaps, not studied. The presence of living tubercle bacilli in a tissue free from active and acute changes characteristic of tuberculosis demonstrates that, whatever the actual degree of virulence of the bacilli may have been, the tissue in which they were found was at this time relatively immune from their action. The manner in which this immunity was produced, and in which the process of healing was initiated, need not be discussed at this time any further than to again direct attention to the fact that the bacilli lost their virulency as regards the cells in this leptomeninx before these cells underwent any marked degree of degeneration. The cells of the tuberculous proliferations survived the further action of the bacilli whose original effect it was to initiate cell accumulation or proliferation; the cells also retained sufficient vitality to develop, in some instances at any rate, into formative cells according as their origin would dictate, e. g. into fibroblasts. That fibroblasts are formed only by embryonal connective tissue cells, and not by wandering cells, such as the large mononuclear leucocytes, we are well aware, is possibly still a disputable assumption, and we do not consider it pertinent to discuss the question any further in connection with this study, but would only emphasize the point that some of the cells of tuberculous proliferations may, under favorable circumstances, become formative cells, and, furthermore, that the amount of formative tissue produced may be far in excess of what is actually needed for purposes of repair only. Surely the appearances here noted indicate that the bacillus of tuberculosis has the power to stimulate fixed cells to multiply, unless one assumes that all, or almost all, the formative cells here seen are derived from wandering cells attracted by the presence of the bacillus and its products. As to the ultimate fate of the formative and other cells in this healing tuberculous tissue no final statements can be made. It must be remembered that it is only one stage in the process of healing that is dealt with. The well marked evidences of fibrillation, the quite extensive formation of new vessels, the absence of evidences of degenerative changes in the uninuclear cells, all point to the production of new fibrous tissue as sure to occur, but it seems quite probable that occasional epithelioid cells may undergo or have undergone dropsical or other forms of degeneration, although it is certainly apparent that so far as the small cells are concerned the involution of the tuberculous tissue is not occurring through disintegration. Perhaps the most interesting feature in this case is the opportunity it affords to study the changes in the giant cells of healing, non-degenerated tuberculous tissue. In the first place, the large number of giant cells is quite remarkable. The general characters of the tissue in which they are found recall the fact that giant cells are regarded as quite constant elements in chronic mild tuberculosis; often the giant cells are the only cells that contain bacilli (Koch). In this instance the giant cells do not contain bacilli that are demonstrable by the usual methods; neither do they contain bodies that can be definitely interpreted as degenerate forms of bacilli such as those found by Metchnikoff, Stchastny, Weicker, and others, in the giant cells of Spermophilus guttatus, in avian and in human tuberculosis. Metchnikoff states, however, that he knows of the occurrence of such degenerate forms only in the Spermophilus guttatus under the circumstances mentioned, and in the rabbit and guinea-pig in mammalian tuberculosis, but not in man; consequently, the manner in which the giant cells rid themselves of the bacilli undoubtedly present in their interior at some time during their existence, must as yet remain without any explanation. In the description of the histological changes the various appearances presented by the giant cells are described somewhat minutely. The essential observations made concern, in my opinion, the further fate of giant cells which are still found to persist in healing nondegenerated tuberculous tissue. It was, I believe, quite conclusively shown that the consecutive changes appear to consist in the breaking up of the nuclei, the removal of the detritus by phagocytes, and the formation of a few apparently viable uninuclear cells in the case of more degenerated, exhausted giant cells, while other, and, as it would seem, better preserved or younger giant cells, separate into a number of individual, uninuclear cells with but little or no nuclear disintegration. Objection might be raised to this interpretation of the appearances in the giant cells. While no one could very well dispute the view that part of the giant cells are undergoing retrogressive and absorptive changes with the production of some viable cells, a question might well be raised concerning the nature of the process taking place in those giant cells that have been spoken of as splitting up or dividing into uninuclear cells and smaller multinucleated masses without much evidence of nuclear disintegration. (ABSTRACT TRUNCATED)
The case reported, in this article is one of a somewhat extensive cutaneous disease, which occurred in a man, 33 years of age, who gave the following history: The disease first made its appearance, eleven and a half years ago, at the back of the left ear, as a pimple which soon became pustular. The process extended forward, very slowly and gradually encroached upon and covered almost the entire face, the central portion of which now presents an atrophic cicatricial condition. Another similar lesion occurred, one month after the primary invasion, on the back of the hand, which healed in about four years, after treatment with caustic. A third lesion appeared on the right side of the scrotum (six months after), which increased in size for a year and then healed spontaneously. A fourth inoculation appeared, on the anterior surface of the left thigh just above the internal condyle, and grew for a year, after which it gradually healed spontaneously. A fifth lesion appeared on the back of the neck and also healed spontaneously after growing for a year. The disease when first examined presented many of the features of a lupus vulgaris. There were no enlarged lymphatic glands and the patient's health had always been good. The family and personal history revealed no syphilitic or tuberculous taint. Sections from the cutaneous lesions showed the presence of what appeared to be budding blastomycetes. The sections also presented pathological features similar to those seen in the first case recorded by Gilchrist; in many sections almost typical tubercles were found. The organisms in the tissue are chiefly spherical, unicellular bodies varying from 10-20 micro in diameter, and consist of a doubly contoured membrane, which encloses a fine granular protoplasm with sometimes a vacuole. Many budding forms in various stages were found; nonucleus could be demonstrated, neither were any mycelium or hyphae present in the tissues. The parasites were almost always found outside of cells, comparatively few being enclosed in giant cells. Pure cultures of the organism were obtained directly from the cutaneous lesions in two places from the pus squeezed out from between the papillomatous variety of the lesion. The organism grew on all ordinary media, and especially well on potato and beer-wort agar. The cultures showed both budding forms and a fairly profuse mycelium. Older cultures, carried through many generations, produced sometimes little or no mycelium. The organisms in the cultures were round, ovoid, doubly contoured, refractive bodies, varying in size from about 10 to 20micro in diameter. The mycelium was, on rare occasions, of two varieties, very fine and also coarse with sessile buds and conidia. Dogs, a horse, a sheep and guinea-pigs were successfully inoculated, the most striking results being nodules, grossly simulating tumors, in the lungs. Microscopically these nodules were of a chronic inflammatory nature and contained numerous parasites identical in appearance with those in the patient. In the tissues of none of the animals successfully inoculated was any mycelium found. Since our organism did not ferment sugar and produced in cultures mycelium, it may either belong to the blastomycetes or to the oidia, but in conformity with prevailing nomenclature we regard it as a blastomyces. We shall term the disease which has been produced by this organism Blastomycetic Dermatitis. We give the name Blastomyces dermatitidis to the parasite which we have isolated and described in this paper. In closing we are of the opinion that it would be advisable to examine more carefully all tuberculous lesions of the skin, and especially those of tuberculosis verrucosa cutis, for the presence of blastomycetes. This can be readily and rapidly done by soaking the unstained sections in ordinary liquor potassse, when the organisms if present will stand out as doubly contoured refractive bodies.
FROM THE RESULTS OF THE VARIOUS EXPERIMENTS ALREADY DETAILED I FEEL JUSTIFIED IN DRAWING THE FOLLOWING CONCLUSIONS: (1) Absolutely fresh thyroid gland is not poisonous, in the usual sense of the term, when absorbed through the alimentary canal. (2) The symptoms of induced thyroidism are manifestations of an intoxication resulting from the ingestion of decomposed thyroid material, a conclusion that agrees in part with the previously related observations of Lanz. (3) The so-called experimental thyroidism is not specific for the thyroid only, for the ingestion of many substances derived from animal tissues other than the thyroid gland may produce an intoxication strikingly similar in every respect to that of experimental thyroidism. (4) Most, if not all, animal tissues yield substances which, if injected in large quantities directly into the circulation or beneath the skin, will produce an intoxication often very similar to that produced by injections of various substances derived from the fresh thyroid tissue. (5) The effects resulting from the intravascular or subcutaneous injections of aqueous extracts, decoctions and the concentrated extractives of the thyroid tissue, of the thymus, of muscle, etc., are by no means necessarily indicative of the function and the action of the hypothetical internal secretions of the same tissues during life. (6) The utilization of the fact that ingestion of decomposed thyroid material produces on certain occasions an intoxication with certain symptoms similar to some of those of G-raves' disease is not justifiable for the furtherance of the theory that the symptoms of exophthalmic goitre result from an over-production of the thyroid secretion. (7) Our results lead us to conclude with Drechsel that the fresh thyroid tissue yields at least probably two substances that are capable of palliating the symptoms of the acute cachexia in totally thyroidless dogs. (8) The thymus tissue also yields one and probably two substances that are as equally capable as the thyroid extractives of palliating the acute cachexia in totally thyroidless dogs. (9) Neither of the above substances is an enzyme, nor does either contain iodine. (10) Neither the feeding of minced raw thyroid glands, nor the injection of aqueous thyroid extracts, decoctions, and concentrated solutions of the extracted palliative thyroid principles is capable of keeping totally thyroidless young dogs alive longer than a few weeks (possibly three weeks). Still less capable are the thyroid preparations containing decomposition products. (11) The presence of one, or usually several, small accessory thyroid bodies, which gradually hypertrophy and wholly or partially assume the functions of the excised thyroid lobes, accounts for the occasionally long survival of thyroidectomized, thyroid-fed, young dogs. (12) Totally thyroidless young dogs are so quickly overwhelmed by the cachexia, and the intervals between the thyroidectomy and the onset of the severe dyspnoeic attacks and subsequent deaths differ so slightly, no matter which of the usual varieties of fresh food are employed, that kinds of fresh food cannot be unquestionably affirmed to influence the onset of the cachexia in any especially definite manner. Animal foods, in which constituents poisonous to rabbits have developed, probably slightly hasten the onset of the severer symptoms, and the vaunted remarkably modifying influence of a diet of ordinary milk, such as Breisacher observed, does not exist in the case of the totally thyroidless dog. (13) Monkeys whose general metabolism is disturbed in consequence of the removal of a greater portion of the thyroid gland, evidently become more susceptible to those constituents of meat that are poisonous to rabbits, and sufficient clinical evidence exists for concluding that probably a like susceptibility to animal foods containing such constituents also exists in men when the function of the thyroid gland is sufficiently disturbed. (14) And, finally, as regards the thyroid factor in the pathology of exophthalmic goitre, I agree with Gley that the majority of the symptoms in many patients with that disease can apparently, from an experimental standpoint, be as plausibly explained by the hypothesis of partially deficient thyroid activity as by the hypothesis of augmentation of thyroid function.
My experiments lead me to believe that complete occlusion of the small intestine at its lower end will give rise to the occurrence of cholin, neurin and perhaps other bases, provided the food taken contains any considerable quantity of lecithin. It is not improbable that still other poisons are formed by bacterial action from other constituents of the food in cases of intestinal obstruction. While cholin would have to be absorbed in relatively large amounts to exert a marked toxic action in human beings it is otherwise with neurin, which is many times more intense in its action and must be classed with the exceedingly active poisons. It has been shown both by the experiments of Schmidt and Weiss and also by those recorded in this paper that the poisonous neurin may be formed from cholin by bacteria. In its physiological action neurin agrees closely with muscarin; especially to be noted here is the paralytic action on the heart and its power to increase the intestinal movements to such an extent that continual evacuations occur. Whether the ptomaine which was found by me is poisonous 1 cannot yet say. It must be considered proved, however, that highly toxic substances may arise in the intestinal canal during its complete occlusion. The method of treating cases of intestinal obstruction, before surgical means are resorted to, namely, washing out the stomach and as much of the gut as possible often reduces the violent paristalsis and this is due, perhaps, to the removal of substances out of which irritating and toxic products are formed by bacteria. In conclusion, I would remark that our knowledge of the fate of lecithin in the digestive canal under normal conditions is very deficient. The assumption that it is saponified by the fat-splitting enzyme of the pancreatic juice, thus yielding cholin, glycero-phosphoric acid and fatty acids, rests on the work of Bókai in 1877 and, as that investigator himself admits, without excluding bacterial action. This omission throws grave doubts on the results. If the assumption of Bókai be correct, caution must be observed in the use of some foods that have been considered most nutritious and healthful; for instance, the ingestion of a meal made up largely of eggs would hardly be without danger because of the poisonous action of the large quantity of cholin liberated from the lecithin and the probability of the formation of the highly poisonous neurin. It is my purpose in the near future to examine this question with the help of modern methods.
(1) There is a transitory glycosuria in diphtheria, which is found frequently in the severe cases and is usually present in the fatal ones. (2) This glycosuria is often associated with albuminuria. (3) Injections of diphtheria antitoxin are occasionally followed for a few days by a slight glycosuria.
THE FOLLOWING GENERAL CONCLUSIONS MAY BE DRAWN FROM THE PRECEDING WORK: Fibrin is altered by formaldehyde and is then less easily digested by pepsin and by trypsin. Papaïn is apparently unable to digest fibrin even when this is exposed to very weak formaldehyde (1:1000) for a very short time. The casein of milk, on contact with formaldehyde, undergoes rapid alteration and is as a result not coagulated by rennet, or but very slowly. Such altered casein, like similar fibrin, is not readily digested by the proteolytic ferments. The longer the formaldehyde acts on casein and on fibrin the more marked is the result. Pepsin is not affected by a one per cent solution of formaldehyde, even when the mixture has stood for four weeks. Even a five per cent solution of formaldehyde acting for three weeks has no effect on pepsin. Contrary results obtained by others are due to an alteration of the fibrin by the formaldehyde. A putrid solution of pepsin in distilled water one month old digests fibrin as readily as a fresh solution. Rennet is not affected even by a four per cent solution of formaldehyde acting for several weeks. The absence of coagulation at times is due to the action of formaldehyde on the casein of the milk and not on the rennet ferment. Papaïn is very quickly altered by formaldehyde, even in very dilute solution. Moreover, it is unable to digest fibrin that has been exposed to the action of a very dilute solution of formaldehyde for a short time. Trypsin is altered by formaldehyde to such an extent that digestion of fibrin will not take place, or but very slowly. The extent to which trypsin is affected by formaldehyde depends largely upon the amount of organic matter present, as well as on the amount of ferment in the solution. Amylopsin is not destroyed by very dilute solutions of formaldehyde, but stronger solutions decrease the activity of the ferment, and if used in sufficient concentration will destroy it completely. Ptyalin, like the diastatic ferment of the pancreas, is not destroyed by dilute solutions of formaldehyde. If the latter is used in rather strong concentration and allowed to act for some time it will destroy the ferment. The action of formaldehyde is more rapid and more marked at a slightly elevated temperature than at ordinary room temperature. Malt diastase, unlike the diastatic ferments of the saliva and pancreatic solution, is not destroyed by formaldehyde when this is used in moderate amount and at ordinary temperature. Unlike pepsin, a solution of malt diastase readily undergoes decomposition on standing even for one or more days. This destruction is undoubtedly due to bacteria since it does not take place when formaldehyde is present. Consequently the favoring action which formaldehyde apparently exerts on diastase really consists in the inhibition of the growth of micro-organisms, and hence the diastase is protected against decomposition.
(1) An acute gonorrhoeal urethritis may be the starting point for a grave general septicaemia with all its possible complications. (2) These infections may be mixed or secondary, due to the entrance into the circulation of organisms other than the gonococcus, or they may be purely gonococcal in nature. (3) Endocarditis is an occasional complication of gonorrhoea. (4) This endocarditis may be transient, disappearing with but few apparent results, or it may leave the patient with a chronic valvular lesion, or it may pursue a rapidly fatal course with the symptoms of acute ulcerative endocarditis. (5) The endocarditis associated with gonorrhoea is commonly due to the direct action of the gonococcus, hut may be the result of a secondary or mixed infection. (6) Pericarditis may also occur as a complication of gonorrhoea, but it is less frequent than endocarditis. It may, as in the case of the latter, be the result either of a pure gonococcal or of a mixed infection. (7) Grave myocardial changes, necroses, purulent infiltration, embolic abscesses are common in the severe gonococcal septicaemias. (8) In instances of gonococcal septicaemia the diagnosis may, in some cases, be made during life by cultures taken from the circulating blood according to proper methods.
1. I have simplified the dilution method by using a stock glycerine emulsion of the virulent cord, from which the desired dilutions can be readily prepared. The proportion of glycerine should not exceed (1/5) part, if it is desired to retain the full virulence of the emulsion. 2. There is some danger of giving rabies to animals in the dilution immunization treatment, a danger which is not present in the Pasteur method. 3. The dried-cord method does not rest solely upon the principle of dilution, but is based also upon attenuation of the virus. 4. The Pasteur method being entirely free from the element of danger which pertains to the glycerine dilution method and resting upon a sounder experimental basis is the one to be preferred.
(1) The application of the Nissl method to the study of the motor cells of the spinal cord, and the nerve cells of the dorsal root ganglia in typhoid fever, shows that these cells regularly suffer pathological changes in the course of the infection. (2) The alterations in the motor cells are more constant and of a severer grade than are those in the cells of the sensory ganglia. The more characteristic changes consist of disintegration, solution and destruction of the chromatic substance of the cell starting from the axone hillock and proceeding toward the nucleus. Coincidently the nuclei of the affected cells seek the periphery. Alterations are also suffered by the nucleus and nucleolus. (3) While this central form of ehromatolysis is the prevailing type of pathological change, disintegration, etc., of the Nissl bodies situated in the periphery of the cell and in the dendrites is also observed (peripheral chromatolysis). (4) In experimental infection with typhoid bacilli in rabbits a similar series of lesions in the corresponding nerve cells in the spinal cord and ganglia is encountered. (5) The main or central type of lesions discovered is identical with that found in man and animals after section, destruction, or even slight injury of the peripheral nerves. (6) The examination of the peripheral nerves arising from the lumbar segment of the cord (the site in man and rabbit of the most profound changes) in rabbits inoculated with typhoid bacilli showed well-marked evidences of parenchymatous degeneration. (7> It is probable that lesions of the peripheral nerves in typhoid fever in human beings are common and that the post-typhoid hyper sthesias and paralyses are due to this cause. (8) Restitution of the chromatic granules may take place in the affected nerve cells, the new formation beginning about the nucleus and extending through the protoplasm.
1. Tubercle bacilli when suspended in. distilled water, normal salt solution, bouillon and milk, are destroyed at 60 degrees C. in 15 to 20 minutes. The larger number are destroyed in 5 to 10 minutes. 2. When tubercle bacilli are suspended in milk, the pellicle which forms during the exposure at 60 degrees C. may contain living bacilli after 60 minutes.
1. As varying amounts of calcium oxalate may be held in solution in the urine, conclusions based upon the presence or number of calcium oxalate crystals found therein are of no real value as an indication of the quantity of oxalic acid present. 2. Unless the utmost care is exercised, the results obtained by quantitative estimation of oxalic acid are subject to large percentages of error. This is especially true in the use of Neubauer's or Shultzen's methods, in which the calcium oxalate is precipitated in an alkaline solution. 3. An ordinary mixed diet regularly contains traces of oxalic acid or its salts. 4. A portion of the oxalic acid ingested with the food may be absorbed and reappear unchanged in the urine. 5. The normal daily excretion of oxalic acid in the urine fluctuates with the amount taken in the food, and varies from a few milligrammes to two or three centigrammes, being usually below ten milligrammes. 6. In health, no oxalic acid, or only a trace, is formed in the body, but that present in the urine has been ingested with the food. 7. In certain clinical disturbances which in some of the cases studied above were associated with absence of free hydrochloric acid from the gastric juice, oxalic acid is formed in the organism. 8. This formation in the organism is connected with fermentative activity in the alimentary canal. (a) The prolonged feeding of dogs with excessive quantities of glucose, together with meat, leads eventually to a state of oxaluria. (6) This experimental oxaluria is associated with a mucous gastritis, and with absence of free hydrochloric acid in the gastric contents. (c) The oxaluria and the accompanying gastritis are referable to fermentation induced by the excessive feeding with sugar. (d) The experimental gastritis from fermentation is associated with the formation of oxalic acid in the gastric contents. 9. The symptoms attributed to an oxalic acid diathesis, with the exception of those due to local irritation in the genitourinary tract, do not appear to be due to the presence in the system of soluble oxalates, but are more likely to depend on other products of fermentation and putrefaction.
THE RESULTS OF THE FOREGOING EXPERIMENTS MAY BE BRIEFLY SUMMARIZED AS FOLLOWS: The amount of antitoxic substance obtained by precipitation with magnesium sulphate from the blood-serum of the horse corresponds, as nearly as can be determined by the use of test guinea-pigs, in full to the protective power of the serum from which it is obtained, i. e. the precipitate from 1 cc. of serum will protect against the same amount of toxin as 1 cc. of the serum itself. Equal amounts of the precipitates by magnesium sulphate from immunized and non-immunized horses act differently toward toxin; i. e. the proportion of protective substance to the precipitate from non-immunized serum is exceedingly small as compared with the proportion of antitoxin to the precipitate from sera of immunized horses. The average precipitate from the sera of immunized horses, as obtained by magnesium sulphate, is more abundant than the average precipitate from sera of non-immunized horses. In the case of the same animal before and after immunization, the serum before immunization gives a less abundant precipitate with magnesium sulphate than the serum tested after immunization. The proportion of increase per unit of antitoxic strength for the same or different horses is not constant. This may be due to an increase of inactive substances (in their relation to diphtheric toxin) or to imperfect methods of determination. The precipitates obtained by magnesium sulphate give all the reactions recognized as characteristic of globulins, and as distinguishing them from other albuminous bodies. We are not warranted, then, in the present state of our knowledge, in considering any part of these precipitates as other than globulin. But it does seem warrantable to conclude, from the fact that the globulins of normal serum do not protect, or only in comparatively large amounts, against diphtheric toxin, that new globulins are formed, or rather greatly increased in the serum of immunized horses, and that these globulins protect against the toxin. These increased globulins and the inert globulins (which from obvious causes are a very variable factor) are both precipitated by magnesium sulphate. Every animal has a physiological and pathological history more or less widely diverging from the normal, hence absolute conformity in the results obtained is not to be expected, at least with our present methods of differentiation.
1. The globulins of both normal and diphtheria antitoxic serum exhibit chemically toward reagents the same reactions, being precipitated by magnesium sulphate and split up into fractions in precisely the same way. 2. All of the diphtheric antitoxic power of both normal and immunized serum is always carried by the globulin and its fractional precipitates. 3. During the fractional precipitation of the serum globulin of horses immunized from diphtheria toxin and horses not immunized from diphtheria toxin, some of the globulin is lost, likewise at the same time some of the antitoxic power of the globulin of the immunized serum is lost. 4. These reactions, considered in connection with the fact that different observers as well as we ourselves have found diphtheric antitoxic power in normal horse's serum and that this antitoxin separates with the globulin, strongly incline us to consider "diphtheria antitoxin" a form of globulin. 5. The reactions of globulin, previously separated from the serum by magnesium sulphate, with sodium chloride lead one to think that there is a formation of globulin salts. 6. Since serum albumin in a magnesium sulphate solution gives fractional precipitates at definite temperatures, it seems not improbable that the albumin is precipitated in the form of albumin salts.
In the case reported in this article there was septicaemia with special localization of the microorganisms in the brain, with gas cysts of the brain and general gaseous emphysema due to Bacillus mucosus capsulatus (aërogenes group). The bacillus isolated from the organs of this case, as well as other members of the aërogenic group of Bacillus mucosus capsulatus can cause general gaseous emphysema in the cadavers of rabbits, either with or without the intravenous injection of sugar before the animal is killed, the gas, however, being most abundant and rapidly formed in the former case. It is not impossible that some of the published cases of gaseous emphysema in which a bacteriological examination was not made, may have been due to members of the Bacillus mucosus capsulatus group.
THE RESULTS OBTAINED IN THIS STUDY MAY BE BRIEFLY SUMMARIZED: 1. Acid-resisting bacilli are found in many of the lower animals, more especially the horse, cow, dog, guinea-pig and white rat. In the case of the rabbit and cat no such organisms were detected. 2. Many of these acid-resisting bacilli resemble the tubercle bacillus and the smegma bacillus of man. 3. The acid-resisting organisms are undoubtedly of different species and there is good reason to believe that the term smegma bacillus denotes not a definite species but rather a group of bacilli having common staining properties.
1. The several standard cultures used in this study are indistinguishable -a conclusion previously reached and stated by Flexner. 2. The acute dysentery of the United States is due to a bacillus indistinguishable from that obtained from the epidemics of dysentery in several other parts of the world. 3. The sporadic and the institutional outbreaks of acute dysentery are caused by the same microorganism, and this organism is identical with that causing epidemic acute dysentery. 4. The cause of acute dysentery, whether sporadic, institutional, or epidemic, is Bacillus dysenteriae Shiga.
The epidemics we have observed, were due to the presence and growth in the frogs of Bacillus hydrophilus fuscus. This was proved by recovering the bacillus in pure culture from the body fluids of frogs sick or dead of the disease, and the inoculation of healthy frogs with an emulsion of the pure culture, and by obtaining the same clinical picture and pathological findings as in the original diseased frogs; and, finally, by recovering the bacillus in pure culture from frogs inoculated and sick or dying as a result of the inoculation. The disease is widely distributed throughout North America and Europe, and in this country and Canada is known as "red-leg." It has been observed by us chiefly in the warm weather of September and October. The disease is characterized by congestion of the ventral surfaces of the body, with more or less ulceration in, and haemorrhage beneath, the skin, bloating due to serous exudation into the lymph sacs, gradual failure to respond to stimuli, which symptoms are followed by coma and death, the last being occasionally preceded by tetanic seizures. After death haemorrhages into the muscles and degenerative changes in the muscles, spleen, liver, and, to a slight degree, in the intestinal tract, are found. The blood shows an advanced degree of anaemia and leucocytosis. Predisposing causes of the disease are lesions of the skin, which seem to be the usual portal of entry of the infection, and lowered resistance from heat and from anaemia. By a series of controlled experiments with inoculated frogs we have shown that, while temperatures a little above freezing have no harmful effect upon the frogs, they completely control all manifestations of the disease in inoculated or diseased frogs, if the frogs are left in the cold for a period as long as seven days; and, further, that even short periods in the cold chamber will bring about a delay of the fatal results in diseased or inoculated frogs. The anaemia so often found in apparently healthy frogs seems in many cases to be due to the presence in the lungs of the frog of a parasite, the Distomum cylindraceum, which, occurring in sufficiently large numbers in an individual frog, is capable of materially diminishing the available supply of red corpuscles. Severe laking of the blood, the presence of numerous isolated red-cell nuclei, and great diminution in the number, or almost total absence of the red cells in the diseased frogs, are in proportion to the severity of the infection and due to bacterial action. The presence of the haematozoan parasite, the Drepanidium, does not play any part as a predisposing or exciting cause of the disease. The ascarid Rhabdomena nigrovenosum, although frequently present as a parasite in the lungs of the frogs, plays no part in causing or promoting the disease.
(1) The cytotoxins are not specific. (2) The changes occurring after the injection of different cytotoxins are similar and do not vary in kind. (3) The changes do, however, vary in degree in the following order, the one having the most marked effect being placed first, etc.: (a) Haemolymphotoxin, (b) Splenotoxin, (c) Lymphotoxin, (d) Endotheliotoxin, (e) Nephrotoxin, (f) Hepatotoxin. (4) Nephrotoxin causes the most specific change. (5) The haemolymph glands play some important part in the production of eosinophiles. The haemolytic action of haemolymphotoxic serum is greater than that of other cytotoxic sera. (6) The histological changes which are observed in every case are secondary to the haemolytic factor present in all cytotoxic sera.
1. Better results in the production of diphtheria antitoxin can be obtained with greater experience in the selection of the most suitable type of horses to be used. Young animals are usually to be preferred. Over one-half of all such horses can be made to yield 300-unit serum, while a third will yield (5)oo-unit serum. 2. High-test horses require a shorter time to immunize and will yield a potent serum for a longer period than will low-test horses. 3. The period of usefulness of an antitoxin horse is short, and on an average endures only a few months. 4. A horse having attained a maximal antitoxic height begins to suffer a decline in antitoxin, which is usually as rapid as the ascent has been, and is unaffected by subsequent injections of diphtheria toxin.
Washed blood corpuscles of certain species of animals in a concentration of about (5) per cent suspended in salt solution containing above 4 per cent of cobra venom undergo changes in their resistance to certain physical and chemical agents. They become non-haemolyzable by water, ether, saponin, and quite strong solutions of lecithin, provided always that the excess of venom has not been entirely removed. On the other hand, certain acids and alkalis, excepting ammonia, lake the venomized corpuscles more easily than they lake normal corpuscles. Venom solutions of 2 per cent and less exert no protective property upon blood corpuscles, but they induce changes in the corpuscles whereby they are rendered more easily laked by the same physical and chemical agents.
The reparative process which follows the wide spread necrosis of the dog's liver caused by the injection of haemagglutinative serum constitutes a chronic interstitial hepatitis of definite and constant character. This is not only a new type of experimental hepatic lesion, but is more definitely a cirrhosis than is any other experimental lesion hitherto described. It is of importance in explaining the histogenesis of cirrhosis, and incidentally various repair processes in the liver; but it does not aid in the elucidation of the etiology of cirrhosis in man, nor does it explain the peculiar arrangement of the new connective tissue in any form of human cirrhosis except possibly that associated with chronic passive congestion. It definitely demonstrates, however, that cirrhosis may follow extensive primary destructive lesions, a view not yet fully accepted, and supports the contention of Kretz that cirrhosis is essentially a reparative process.
THE FACTS COLLECTED IN THE THIRD PART OF THIS PAPER JUSTIFY THE FOLLOWING CONCLUSIONS: (1) All of the cardinal symptoms of Stokes-Adams disease may be duplicated by heart-block resulting from a lesion in or near the auriculo-ventricular bundle of His, and by this alone. (2) No typical case of Stokes-Adams disease has been described in which heart-block might not have been the cause of the trouble. (3) It can be shown that all cases of Stokes-Adams disease which have been studied by sufficiently accurate methods were cases of heart-block. (4) It would appear that heart-block without and with syncopal attacks are two stages of the same disease process.
Since the haemolysins of the several venoms respond differently to photodynamic action, they may be regarded as possessing different chemical constitutions. As regards stability, cobra haemolysin ranks first, daboia second, and Crotalus third. The toxicity of all the venoms is more or less diminished by eosin and erythrosin in sunlight. This reduction in toxicity depends upon chemical changes, of more or less profound nature, taking place in certain of the active principles of the venom. The more stabile the predominant active principles the less the reduction in toxicity, and vice versa. Venom-neurotoxins are highly resistant to photodynamic action, venom-haemolysins are less resistant, while the haemorrhagin and thrombokinase of Crotalus and daboia venoms exhibit weak powers of resistance to their action. Hence it follows that while cobra venom remained almost unaltered, rattlesnake and daboia venoms were greatly reduced in toxicity when mixed with the fluorescent dyes and exposed to sunlight. There is an interesting parallel between the action of eosin and erythrosin upon the different venoms and their reactions to other injurious agencies. For example, the haemolysins of cobra and daboia venoms are more heat resistant than the haemolysin of Crotalus venom, and the former are less injured by the dyes than the latter. The neurotoxin of the former venoms is also more heat stabile than that of the rattlesnake, and the same relative degree of resistance holds for this substance and the anilines. Just as the haemorrhagin of rattlesnake venom and the thrombokinase of daboia venom are destroyed by a temperature of 75 degrees C., so are they readily inactivated by the photo dynamic substances employed. The globulin-precipitating and blood corpuscle-protecting principle of cobra venom is relatively thermostabile and in contradistinction to the immunity-precipitins it is also unaffected by eosin and erythrosin. This study of the action of photodynamic substances upon snake venoms serves again to bring out the fact of their highly complex nature, and while enlarging somewhat the field in which photodynamic activity is known to operate, it also proves that this form of destructive activity is affected by the same conditions of resistance as confront the action of the usual physical and chemical agents.
The cerebral circulation was interrupted for periods of three to eighty-one minutes by ligation of the innominate and left subclavian arteries proximal to the origin of the vertebral, in ninety-three cats. Eleven dogs were used in the earlier experiments. The eye reflexes disappear very quickly and a period of high blood pressure follows the occlusion immediately; vagus inhibition causes cardiac slowing and a fall in blood pressure, followed by a second rise after the vagus center succumbs to anaemia. Respiration stops temporarily (twenty to sixty seconds) after the beginning of occlusion, and then follows a series of strong gasps of the Cheyne-Stokes type, after which it stops until some time after the restoration of the cerebral circulation. The respiratory and vagus centers lose their power of functioning at approximately the same time. Asphyxial slowing of the heart may occur without the agency of the vagus center. The blood pressure slowly falls to a level which is maintained throughout the remainder of the period of occlusion. The anterior part of the cord and the encephalon lose all function; no reflexes are obtainable. The reflexes of the posterior part of the cord persist; the intravenous injection of strychnine does not affect the anterior part of the cord during the period of occlusion; but does affect the posterior portion of the cord. There is no secretion of tears or saliva, and the intra-ocular pressure is reduced. The blood pressure falls still more after release of the cerebra arteries, but soon begins to rise. The respiration returns suddenly, two to sixty minutes after restoration of the cerebral circulation, the first gasp being a strong one. The rate gradually increases until rapid enough for natural respiration. The eye reflexes and intra-ocular tension return more gradually, ten minutes to three hours after restoration of the cerebral circulation. The anterior part of the cord recovers its functions gradually. The first reflexes occur only on the same side as the stimulus, crossing of reflexes, to involve the other side, not occurring till later. As a rule, all reflexes return, and a short period of quiet follows. The anterior part of the cord again becomes irritable to strychnine, but succumbs to its action before the normal part. Spasms, of tonic, clonic, or mixed type, then appear, terminating in (a) death, (b) partial or (c) complete recovery. In partial recovery, disturbances of locomotion, such as walking in a circle, paralysis, dementia, loss of sight, hearing, and general intelligence, characterize the post-convulsive period. After complete recovery, there is a return to normal deportment. No gross lesions of the nervous system, other than a congested appearance of the previously anaemic area, were observed. Transection of the spinal cord stops the spasms below the level of section. Hemisection of the cord stops the spasms on the same side, below the level of section. Death, without any return of the reflexes after release of the cerebral arteries, has followed an occlusion of seven and one-half minutes. Respiration has returned after an occlusion of one hour. Five animals have recovered completely after an occlusion of seven minutes or more. Only one animal has recovered completely after an occlusion of fifteen minutes. No animal has recovered completely after an occlusion of twenty minutes. In Herzen's (26) resuscitation of an animal after several hours of cerebral anaemia, there must have been some anastomotic channels to the brain. Mayer's (27) limit of ten to fifteen minutes of cerebral anaemia, beyond which resuscitation is not practicable, is close to the correct one. It appears to us that, in cases of resuscitation two hours after cessation of the heart-beat, (Prus., loc.cit.) the auricles must have kept up a slow but, in some degree, an efficient movement of the blood through the brain. The truth of this suggestion might be tested by introducing some easily recognized, non-diffusible substance into a vein after the heart-beat ceases to affect a manometer, and later searching for it in the brain and other parts of the body. But, whatever the reason, cerebral anaemia in these cases must have been less complete than in our experiments. The histological alterations of the cord and brain are now being studied. The results will be published later.
1. In a patient with typhoid fever, who had taken, during eleven days, 132 grammes of lactate of calcium by the mouth, as well as 5 grammes of chloride of calcium subcutaneously, there developed, eleven days after the subcutaneous infusion, a large abscess of the breast from which Bacillus typhosus and Staphylococcus aureus were obtained on culture. The abscess was opened and the wound packed with iodoform gauze. Eleven days later a deposit of calcium appeared in the granulation tissue bordering the wound. This rapidly increased until the rim of the opening and the lining granulation tissue were converted into a hard, calcareous mass. A number of nodules of an apparently similar character appeared in other parts of the breast. 2. A month later the iodoform packing was removed and the patient was put on a carbohydrate free diet. This was continued for twenty-four of the next thirty-six days. Under this treatment the abscess almost entirely healed with complete disappearance of the deposit of calcium. 3. Studies of the intake and output of calcium showed that, during three days under a diet of milk and eggs there was a material calcium retention ((I).346 grammes) : (b) That during two periods amounting to three weeks in all, under a carbohydrate free diet, there was an excess of Ca elimination over the intake of 3.672 grammes, (c) That during ten days following the last carbohydrate free period, under a normal diet, there was a retention of calcium amounting to 0.602 gramme. 4. The disappearance of calcium from the breast was associated in time with the carbohydrate free diet and the excessive elimination of calcium. 3. Under the carbohydrate free diet acetone and diacetic acid appeared on two occasions in the urine, but were not accompanied by any increase in the elimination of calcium. 6. With regard to the cause of the calcification, we cannot speak with certainty. The remarkable association of the deposition of calcium at the seat of an injection of calcium chloride in an individual who had been receiving large quantities of lactate of calcium by the mouth-a deposition occurring in tissues which were in direct connection with or in the immediate neighborhood of a dressing containing iodoform, a poison which in certain animals produces degenerative changes in the kidneys and liver which are peculiarly prone to calcification, is striking and worthy of note. 7. In how far the decalcification of the affected area may have been due to the carbohydrate free regime with the consequent excess in calcium elimination, it is impossible, on the basis of a single case, to say. The coincidence in time of the disappearance of calcium from the breast with this treatment is, however, remarkable and extremely suggestive.
A specific antivenin against crotalus venom can be prepared bv the immunization of goats. A specific antivenin against water moccasin venom can be produced by the immunization of goats with this venom, modified by hydrochloric acid. Immunization with the unmodified venom is very difficult. The toxicity of crotalus venom is diminished more than fifty percent. by passage through a Chamberland filter. There is a simple relation between the toxicity and the body weight for guinea-pigs weighing from 250 to 500 grams. Smaller guinea-pigs (125 grams) are comparatively less resistant. The toxicity is smaller by subcutaneous than by intraperitoneal injection (guinea-pigs), or by intravenous injection (rabbits). White rats are very resistant. The toxicity of cobra venom is not measurably diminished by filtration through a Chamberland filter. The relation between the amount of venom and the corresponding time of death is very regular, and can be expressed by a curve of asymptotic nature. Lecithin does not increase the toxicity. The tracings representing toxin-antitoxin neutralization for the three venoms (crotalus, cobra and moccasin) show deviation from the straight line. This deviation is most pronounced for the toxic quota of the venoms. The tracing representing crotalus venomantivenin neutralization, determined on guinea-pigs, can, within errors of experiment, be expressed by the equation: Free toxin . Free antitoxin = K . toxin-antitoxin. The corresponding tracing determined on rabbits is somewhat different, but both tracings are much more markedly curved than that for cobra venom-antivenin. The neutralization tracing of water moccasin venom shows the peculiarity, that small amounts of antivenin decrease the toxicity to a minimum, but the toxicity is again increased by further addition of antitoxin. The tracing representing neutralization of the haemolysins of the three venoms are different from the tracings of neutralization of the toxins, and approach very closely to a straight line. Still, in all instances, the determinations with great concentrations of antilysin show pronounced deviation, perhaps due to some dissociation of the toxin-antitoxin combination.
Previous investigators have found that complete occlusion of the ureter may lead either to hydronephrosis or to atrophy. In Lindemann's series of six dogs;, for instance: Two animals showed simple hydronephrosis, three animals showed simple atrophy, and in one animal the kidney was slightly enlarged and the ureter and pelvis dilated, but fluid was absent. In his series of four rabbits, all showed hydronephrosis. The result, whether hydronephrosis or atrophy, is evidently not determined by the time elapsing after the operation. Lindemann found that the intrapelvic pressure resulting from the ligation obliterates the lumen of the vessels, first of the veins and subsequently of the arteries; but that this is compensated by an increase of the collateral blood supply through the capsule, the degree of this compensation determining the presence or absence of hydronephrosis. If the blood supply is free, the fluid after tapping will accumulate again and again. It is somewhat remarkable that all of our dogs showed hydronephrosis after the first operation. The results of establishing a urinary fistula differed in the two cases in which it was tried: The fluid did not re-form in Dog 3 even when sodium sulphate was injected: whereas in Dog 4, a very abundant quantity of fluid reaccumulated spontaneously; but it differed notably in composition from the original fluid, having more the character of a purulent inflammatory exudate. The histological changes consist in necrosis of the renal cells, obliteration of the glomeruli, increase of connective tissue, and endarteritis and periarteritis. Different areas in the same kidney are affected in very different degree, some areas appearing almost normal. The glomeruli are generally less altered than the tubules. The collecting tubules are generally displaced so as to run parallel to the surface; many are dilated. The changes correspond closely to those described by Lindemann. The sound kidneys showed slight hyperaemia and hypertrophy, but no necrosis. This corresponds with the findings of Pearce and of Ames. The uniformity in chemical composition of the fluid obtained, after the first operation, from the four dogs, as shown by Column III of Table I, is very striking, and points to a uniform origin by a process which is but little affected by the interval elapsing after the operation. The specific gravity, total solids and proteids correspond to those of a very dilute lymph, being but a trifle above those of cerebro-spinal fluid and aqueous humor, and much lower than those of serum, lymph and most cystic fluids (the proteid content of the latter being generally from 2 to 6.5 per cent.). The human fluid (Column II) which had remained in the kidney for a very long time had a particularly low proteid percentage; while that of the second fluid of Dog 4 (Column VIII) was very much higher; this last fluid having a pronounced inflammatory character and being of recent formation. The absence of notable amounts of the specific urinary constituents is particularly important.(4) Odorous principles are entirely absent. Urinary pigments appear to be present in the four dogs' urines, but absent from the human case,(5) and after the second operation in case of the dogs. It seems fair to assume that the pigments were secreted shortly after the ligation, when the kidneys were still functional, and that they were reabsorbed with extreme slowness. Urea was present in all the fluids, but its quantity was very small in the dogs, and probably in the human case. It is on the whole somewhat greater than in the serum (0.103 per cent., in place of 0.05 per cent.), but the difference may be within the analytical error. The same applies to the ammonia, phosphates and sulphates. An important difference between these fluids on the one hand and blood serum, lymph and ordinary exudate on the other, lies in the higher contents of chlorid, and the consequently greater molecular concentration. The ordinary chlorid content of body fluid varies between 0.55 and 0.70 per cent., mean about 0.6 per cent (as NaCl), while that of the first kidney fluid, in the dogs, varied between 0.68 and 0.75 per cent., mean 0.725 per cent.; that of the human fluid was 0.83 per cent., that of the second fluid of Dog 4 only 0.52 per cent. The depression of the freezing point in the human case was 0.715 degrees C., as against the normal value, for human serum, of 0.491 to 0.562. (Possibly the blood of this patient had a higher concentration than normal, since uraemia existed.) The high chlorid percentage has evidently no relation to the length of time during which the fluid sojourned in the kidney. It is probably to be explained by the relatively slow absorption of this ion from the kidney pelvis. It is also to be remarked that cerebrospinal fluids generally have a somewhat high chlorid content (0.573 and 0.6 per cent.), but this never reaches the height of these ureteral fluids.
1. Both diphtheria and tetanus toxin and their antitoxins arc electro-positive, that is, they pass to the cathode under the influence of an electric current. 2. The character of the charge is not altered by a change in the reaction of the solvent. 3. The combination of toxin and antitoxin would seem to represent not a true chemical reaction but the adsorption of one colloid by another.
1. In the liver of portal cirrhosis there is a far freer communication between the arterial and portal currents than in the normal liver. 2. Factors contributing to the increased portal pressure in portal cirrhosis are (1) the direct communication of the arterial pressure to the portal vessels through dilated capillaries, (2) the larger volume-flow of the hepatic artery in proportion to the portal flow in cirrhosis as compared to that in the normal liver. 3. A portal cirrhotic liver gives passage to an amount of portal fluid proportionate to .its weight. There is no obstruction to the portal vessels from fibrosis in the large portal cirrhotic liver. 4. From an arterial inflow there is a free return flow through the portal as well as through the hepatic veins in both normal and cirrhotic livers. 5. From a portal inflow the return is through the hepatic vein only. The Gad's theory of valves and the arterial capillary network account for this fact. 6. The portal pressure has a decided influence on the arterial volume-flow and vice versa. This influence is more marked in the cirrhotic than in the normal liver. 7. The communication of the arterial pressure to the portal pressure is an important factor in an explanation of the increased portal pressure in portal cirrhosis.
The conclusions I would draw from this work are merely those stated in a former paper. 1. The results obtained by injections of streptococci are different from those produced by Micrococcus rheumaticus. 2. Micrococcus rheumaticus cannot be regarded as an attenuated streptococcus, nor acute rheumatism as an attenuated streptococcal pyaemia. 3. In uncomplicated cases of acute rheumatism the organism may not be found in the blood or in the joint exudates.
The inhibiting action of the blood serum upon the enzyme of the polynuclear leucocytes, leucoprotease, is exerted by the albumin fraction of the serum. The albumin fraction contains no proteolytic enzymes. The globulin fraction of the serum contains no anti-enzyme for leucoprotease; it contains, on the contrary, an enzyme which digests proteids in a neutral or alkaline medium. This enzyme resembles leucoprotease which is present in the polynuclear leucocytes of an inflammatory exudate and in the bone marrow from which these cells are derived, and is doubtless identical with the similar enzyme occurring in smaller quantity in the spleen. This enzyme which is present in the blood serum is held in check by its anti-enzyme, but the latter is in such excess that the serum as a whole is capable of checking the action of leucoprotease when added in considerable quantity. Leucoprotease of one mammalian species is inhibited by sera of other mammalian species, but the anti-enzymotic activity of various sera differs; the anti-enzyme of the rabbit's serum is stronger than that of dog's serum, when tested either with dog's or with rabbit's leucoprotease. The co-existence in the rabbit of leucoprotease with feeble strength and anti-body of great activity may explain the absence in these animals of typical suppuration with liquefaction of tissues. The serum of birds which have been tested, namely, pigeon and hen, almost completely fails to inhibit mammalian leucoprotease (of dog). The polynuclear leucocytes, the bone marrow and the spleen of the hen do not contain an enzyme resembling leucoprotease of mammals. The absence of anti-enzyme in the serum is associated with absence of a corresponding enzyme in the leucocytes.
1. Tetanolysin and antitetanolysin travel toward the cathode under the influence of an electric current. 2. The specific agg-lutinins are electro-positive. 3. The proteid matter of serum is not amphoteric but travels toward the cathode whether its reaction be acid, neutral, or alkaline. 4. The bacteria-agglutinin combination may be disassociated by means of the electric current.
The experiments show merely that blood vessels transplanted from dog to cat can act as arteries for seventy-seven days at least; and that having spent several days in cold storage does not interfere with their ordinary functions. The animals operated upon must, however, be kept under observation for several months, or, indeed, for several years, before any conclusion can be drawn concerning the practicability of this method of preservation and heterotransplantation of blood vessels.
Following the divisions before used, the results presented in the preceding pages may be briefly stated. I. The particular method of sensitization and the place where the test injection is made have an important bearing on the results obtained by various workers. Comparing the results obtained by the various methods, we may conclude that the incubation period of the hypersensitive reaction is not sharply limited, but that there is a progressive increase in sensitiveness from the sixth day, and presumably before that, extending over a period of several weeks. It seems very probable that the degree of hypersensitiveness attained where the sensitizing dose consists of a mixture of diphtheria toxin and serum is greater than when a single dose of the same small quantity of serum is given alone. II. Our early experiments, the first in this field, are in thorough agreement with those first reported by Otto, and shortly after him by Rosenau and Anderson. III. This hypersensitive reaction is transmissible from mother to offspring. The transmission is probably not equally effective in all cases, and individual young guinea-pigs probably vary greatly in the rate with which they lose their ability to react. As a result not all of the young of a hypersensitive mother react to a subcutaneous dose of five cubic centimeters of serum given when they are four or five weeks old. The reaction in the young animals differs quite markedly from that in those actively sensitized. These differences are such as to indicate that in the mother there is a considerable localization of the reaction in tissues and organs whose destruction does not cause sudden death. This local reaction is a protective factor and is not transmitted to the same degree as the factors involved in the fatal acute reaction. IV. The hypersensitive reaction to horse serum depends on the development of a special anti-body during the incubation period, which anti-body may be passively transferred to a fresh animal. If the dose of hypersensitive serum be sufficient, and the intoxicating injection be given directly into the circulation, this passive hypersensitiveness may be enough so that the animal will die when tested. There is also in the serum of hypersensitive guinea-pigs an uneliminated horse serum element or "rest," which is distinct from this antibody, and probably without influence on the course of the acute reaction. V. The anti-body on which the hypersensitive reaction depends may be entirely neutralized by horse serum without causing symptoms. The gradual introduction of increasing doses over a total period of twenty-four hours suffices for this. The animal is then, properly speaking, neither immune nor refractory, but is essentially in the condition of a normal animal which has recently had a large dose of horse serum. This rapid neutralization is made possible by the great binding power which the subcutaneous and other relatively unimportant tissues have for the toxic element of the serum. The so-called "Phenomenon of Arthus" is probably the same reaction for the rabbit that we have here dealt with in the guinea-pig. The fact that the manifestation is more prominently a local one depends on racial differences. I have encountered cases in the guinea-pig in which the conditions in the rabbit are closely simulated.
Sporulation of B. anthracis, B. subtilis, B. cereus, B. ruminatus, B. mesentericus, B. anthracoides and B. megatherium does not take place in an agar medium containing eosin "Gelb" in a concentration exceeding 0.5 per cent. In a concentration of 0.1 per cent. most of these bacteria fail to produce spores. The greatest sensitiveness is shown by B. cereus and B. mesentericus. In a bouillon medium sporulation is likewise inhibited by eosin, but after a longer time-seven weeks or more-sporulation still occurs where the concentration of the dye equals one-tenth per cent. Sporulation of B. tetani, B. anthracis symptomaticus, B. botulismus, B. oedema maligni, B. enteritidis sporogenes, and B. putrificus does not take place in a medium containing eosin "Gelb" in concentrations exceeding 0.03 per cent. With these organisms, no difference was noted in the final effect, depending on the medium employed. No permanent loss of power to produce spores ensues with the bacteria tested even after long sojourn in the eosinized media. It may be stated that on the whole the inhibitory action of eosin was more pronounced upon the anaerobic than upon the aerobic species of bacteria employed in these experiments.
Calcium salts hasten and magnesium salts retard the development of rigor mortis, that is, when these salts are administered subcutaneously or intravenously. When injected intra-arterially, concentrated solutions of both kinds of salts cause nearly an immediate onset of a strong stiffness of the muscles which is apparently a contraction, brought on by a stimulation caused by these salts and due to osmosis. This contraction, if strong, passes over without a relaxation into a real rigor. This form of rigor may be classed as work-rigor (Arbeitsstarre). In animals, at least in frogs, with intact cords, the early contraction and the following rigor are stronger than in animals with destroyed cord. If M/8 solutions-nearly equimolecular to "physiological" solutions of sodium chloride-are used, even when injected intra-arterially, calcium salts hasten and magnesium salts retard the onset of rigor. The hastening and retardation in this case as well as in the cases of subcutaneous and intravenous injections, are ion effects and essentially due to the cations, calcium and magnesium. In the rigor hastened by calcium the effects of the extensor muscles mostly prevail; in the rigor following magnesium injection, on the other hand, either the flexor muscles prevail or the muscles become stiff in the original position of the animal at death. There seems to be no difference in the degree of stiffness in the final rigor, only the onset and development of the rigor is hastened in the case of the one salt and retarded in the other. Calcium hastens also the development of heat rigor. No positive facts were obtained with regard to the effect of magnesium upon heat vigor. Calcium also hastens and magnesium retards the onset of rigor in the left ventricle of the heart. No definite data were gathered with regard to the effects of these salts upon the right ventricle.
Among so many etiological factors, it is impossible to discriminate which are responsible for the complications which took place in our experiments. An attempt to explain the occurrence of nephritis, cedema or calcification of the arterial system, for instance, will not be made, but the technique of the operations will be modified in order to suppress as much as possible the causes which may originate these secondary changes. The purpose of this article was not to analyze minutely the physiological or pathological character of the functions of transplanted kidneys, but merely to ascertain whether these functions are efficiently reëstablished. It is to be concluded that an animal which has undergone a double nephrectomy and the grafting of both kidneys from another animal can secrete almost normal urine with his new organs, and live in good health at least for a few weeks. This demonstrates that it is possible to reëstablish efficiently the functions of transplanted kidneys.
THE CONCLUSIONS TO BE DEDUCED FROM THIS BRIEF SERIES OF EXPERIMENTS ARE AS FOLLOWS: 1. The ophthalmo-tuberculin reaction is of some value for diagnosis of tuberculosis in cattle. A characteristic conjunctivitis with fibrinous exudation coming on from six to eight hours, reaching a maximum in from sixteen to twenty-four hours and disappearing in forty-eight hours, is noted in tubercular animals. 2. The reaction is more pronounced in those animals which have not been recently tested with tuberculin. With this reaction as with the usual tuberculin test one injection and reaction probably inhibit a second reaction during a period from six weeks to a year. The ordinary tuberculin test does not seem to interfere to any great extent with the ophthalmo-tuberculin test at least within four weeks. Class B, though recently tested, showed the reaction, although not to the extent of Class A, which was tested some time ago. The tuberculin test occasionally prevents absolutely a second reaction, and usually no second reaction occurs within six weeks to a year, as before stated. 3. In cattle recently tested with tuberculin by the subcutaneous method the ophthalmo-tuberculin reaction is only slightly reduced in its intensity. The ophthalmic test may possibly serve as a means of diagnosis of tuberculosis in cattle which have been tested with tuberculin by the ordinary method and will not react a second time, or where tuberculin has been injected into cattle in order that they may clear a second test. Another possibility must not be overlooked in this connection. It is well known that animals which have a slight tubercular infection often show a very marked and typical reaction to the tuberculin test as it is usually made, and those animals which show themselves clinically to be in the advanced stages of tuberculosis often show only a very slight reaction. The animals in Class B are in the advanced stages of tuberculosis and this fact might perhaps account for the lower intensity of the reaction. The exact cause of the lower reaction in these cattle can only be determined by further experimentation. 4. No constitutional disturbance being noticed in any of the cattle tested, that is, no rise in temperature, loss of appetite or falling off in the production of milk, it is evident that the instillation of tuberculin into the eye does not produce the general reaction which attends in some cases the subcutaneous injection of tuberculin, and is therefore decidedly advantageous. The exudate disappears and leaves the eye perfectly normal in forty-eight hours after injection. 5. If the ophthalmo-tuberculin test proves as efficacious as the foregoing experiments seem to indicate we have in it a comparatively rapid and easy means of diagnosing tuberculosis in cattle. Such being the case the method cannot fail to come into general use superseding the present laborious method of applying the test. Cattle can be injected and then inspected sixteen to twenty-four hours afterward. There are many problems in connection with the reaction which must necessarily be studied. The following are a few of the propositions: 1. Is it possible to tell by the reaction how far the tubercular process has progressed in the body? 2. Is there any relationship between the intensity of the reaction and the number and severity of the tubercular lesions? 3. Will the test prove to be more accurate than the ordinary tuberculin test which is said to reveal all but four per cent. of the cases ? 4. Will the test reveal tuberculosis after a subcutaneous tuberculin injection? 5. Will animals react a second time if the first tuberculin is placed in the eye and the second given by the ordinary subcutaneous method and conversely? These and many more points must be thoroughly investigated before the efficiency of the test is proven. The opththalmo-tuberculin test will be repeated on other cattle, and also on the cattle used in these experiments. Experiments are being made to determine the efficiency of the cutaneous tuberculin reaction in cattle. We wish in this paper to give only the preliminary findings.
1. The lymph of the thoracic duct furnishes to the blood a larger proportion than is usually supposed of the lymphocytes in circulation. Gross variations in its output of such cells must affect very considerably the blood picture. 2. The quantity of lymphocytes supplied through the thoracic duct of the healthy dog remains practically constant from hour to hour, if the physiological conditions are not notably changed. Transient change in physiological conditions may alter the output of cells, but with the disappearance of this change the output tends to resume its previous rate. These facts indicate that the tissues producing lymphocytes are "set" at a rate of activity definite in the individual. 3. Muscular activity (struggle) produces a prompt increase in the output of lymphocytes through the thoracic duct. (a) This is assured by the presence of an increased number of cells per cubic millimeter of lymph, combined with an increase in the amount of lymph voided. (b) The lymphocyte-output may be tripled or quadrupled during a long-continued struggle. (c) Following prolonged struggle the output of lymphocytes is for a short time less than previous to the exertion. 4. The increased lymph-flow caused by a lymphagogue of the second class (glucose) brings with it increased output of lymphocytes through the thoracic duct. (a) The individual cubic millimeters of lymph are often poor in cells, during the rapid lymph-flow, yet the total number of elements transported is large. (b) The results with glucose support the theory of Ehrlich, that a rapidly appearing lymphocytosis may be produced through the flushing effect of increased lymph-flow. 5. A comparison of the effects of struggle with those of glucose demonstrates that in the former some factor besides increase in lymph-flow per se (Ehrlich) works to cause the large output of lymphocytes. The nature of this factor has not yet been determined. 6. The variations caused by muscular exertion and by increased lymph-flow in the number of lymphocytes coursing through the thoracic duct are so pronounced as to suggest that the total number of lymphocytes in circulation must be considerably influenced by them. Clinical findings by other observers indicate that this is true; and the clinical findings themselves become much simpler of interpretation. 7. The results in general prove the existence, reserved from circulation, of a large fund of lymphocytes, which is quickly yielded to the blood under certain physiological conditions.
Positive results have been obtained in but a single set of experiments, namely those in which turpentine was employed. In so far as the results of this preliminary study go, one is led to the conclusion that thrombosis is most readily induced when active inflammatory lesions exist in the blood vessels, associated, probably in most instances, with secondary degenerative changes. Purely mechanical lesions are much less apt to be productive of conditions favorable to thrombosis as a sequence of phlebitis. Marked artificial increase or decrease in the coagulation time of the blood by the use of calcium lactate or citric acid, does not render animals abnormally prone to thrombosis incited by changes other than inflammatory. When true phlebitis exists, thrombosis is apt to be more extensive and less readily resolved, when the coagulation point of the blood has been shortened by the use of calcium lactate, and it is less extensive and more quickly absorbed when the coagulation time has been increased by the administration of citric acid. Experiments as yet incomplete appear to suggest that the increasing in rapidity or slowing of the general circulatory stream has but little bearing on the production of thrombosis in phlebitis, much less, indeed, than clinical and anatomical observations have generally led us to think. We have also been led to suspect that the presence or absence of anastomoses of abundant degree is largely concerned as a factor in determining the location and extent of thrombosis in phlebitis.
In view of theoretical deductions and the positive results obtained in the above experiments, it would seem probable that the production of waxy degeneration depends upon the action of lactic acid which is formed by the living muscle under the stimulation of infecting bacteria or their toxins, the formation of large amounts of lactic acid and its accumulation being perhaps favored by defective circulation through the injured muscle. The hyaline transformation of muscle acted upon by lactic acid is analogous to the swelling of fibrin placed in dilute acids. This view is supported by both negative and positive experimental evidence-the negative evidence being that simple anemic necrosis, aseptic or antiseptic autolysis whether in vivo or in vitro, or the action of bacteria of various sorts on muscle in vitro, are all incapable of causing changes in muscle cells resembling those characteristic of waxy or hyaline degeneration of striated muscle. The positive evidence consists in the demonstration that lactic acid, even in dilutions comparable to the amounts that can be formed in living muscle, can produce a similar or identical waxy transformation of the striated muscle fibers, both in vitro and in vivo; and also the observation that muscles stimulated to exhaustion, under which condition lactic acid is known to accumulate in the muscle, show microscopically changes identical with those of Zenker's waxy degeneration.
1. Tetany occurs spontaneously in many forms and may also be produced by the destruction of the parathyroid glands. Recent researches tend to demonstrate an intimate relation between the various forms of tetany and relative or absolute insufficiency of the parathyroid gland. 2. The parathyroid glands are independent organs with definite specific function. Whether or not this function is intimately related to that of other organs of internal secretion is not as yet proven. 3. The number and distribution of the parathyroid glands varies. Failure to produce tetany experimentally is probably due to the fact that some parathyroid tissue remains after an apparently complete extirpation. When extirpation is complete tetany appears, even in herbivora. Only a very small amount of parathyroid tissue is required to prevent this. 4. The effect of the extirpation of the parathyroid glands may be annulled by the reintroduction of an extract of these glands even from an animal of widely different character. The active principle is associated with a nucleo-proteid in the extract and may be separated with this nucleo-proteid from the remaining inert albuminous substances. Its effect in counteracting tetany appears some hours after injection and lasts several days. 5. The parathyroid glands contain no considerable amount of iodine. The parathyroid extract is not an iodine containing compound. 6. In tetany there is apparently some disturbance of the composition of the circulating fluids ordinarily prevented by the secretion of the parathyroid, which disarranges the balance of the mineral constituents of the tissues. Possibly this consists in the appearance of an injurious substance of an acid nature for such tetany may he relieved by extensive bleeding with replacement of the blood by salt solution. No actual poisonous material has, however, been demonstrated by the transference of the blood of a tetanic animal to the veins of a normal one. 7. Numerous researches have shown the important relation of the calcium salts to the excitability of the central nervous system. Their withdrawal leaves the nerve cells in a state of hyperexcitability which can be made to disappear by supplying them with a solution of a calcium salt. 8. Tetany may be regarded as an expression of hyperexcitability of the nerve cells from some such cause. 9. The injection of a solution of a salt of calcium into the circulation of an animal in tetany promptly checks all the symptoms and restores the animal to an apparently normal condition. 10. Injections of magnesium salts probably have a similar effect but these effects are masked by the toxic action of the salt. 11. The injection of sodium or potassium salts has no such beneficial effect but rather tends to intensify the symptoms. This is true also of the alkaline salts of sodium which were studied especially in respect to their basic properties. 12. The effect of calcium is of value in human therapeutics in combating the symptoms of spontaneous forms of tetany and in relieving the symptoms in cases of operative tetany and thus tiding over the period of acute parathyroid insufficiency until remnants of parathyroid tissue can recover their function or new parathyroid tissue can be transplanted. It is in this way an important and convenient ally of the method of injecting parathyroid extract. 13. Studies of the metabolism in parathyroidectomized animals show: 1. A marked reduction in the calcium content of the tissues especially of the blood and brain, during tetany. 2. An increased output of calcium in the urine and faeces on the development of tetany. 3. An increased output of nitrogen in the urine. 4. An increased output of ammonia in the urine with 4a. an increased ammonia ratio in the urine. 5. An increased amount of ammonia in the blood. Much of this affords evidence of the existence of some type of acid intoxication. Its effects are, however, not neutralized by the introduction of alkaline sodium salts and may perhaps be regarded as especially important in producing a drainage of calcium salts from the tissues which can be remedied by the reintroduction of calcium salts. 14. Emphasis must be laid upon the remarkable difference which exists between the alterations inmetabolism following thyroidectomy and those following parathyroidectomy. In myxoedema there is lowered metabolism, decreased respiratory changes and lowered nitrogen output with depression of body temperature. In tetany there is increased metabolism, probably increased respiratory changes, certainly increase in nitrogen output and elevation of the temperature. 15. It is important, therefore, that in any experiments upon metabolism in relation to the thyroid and parathyroid gland, these glands should be clearly distinguished as structures exercising very different and in large part contrary effects upon metabolism. 16. In general the role of the calcium salts in connection with tetany may be conceived of as follows: These salts have a moderating influence upon the nerve cells. The parathyroid secretion in some way controls the calcium exchange in the body. It may possibly be that in the absence of the parathyroid secretion, substances arise which can combine with calcium, abstract it from the tissues and cause its excretion and that the parathyroid secretion prevents the appearance of such bodies. The mechanism of the parathyroid action is not determined, but the result, the impoverishment of the tissues with respect to calcium and the consequent development of hyperexcitability of the nerve cells, and tetany is proven. Only the restoration of calcium to the tissues can prevent this. 17. This explanation is readily applicable to spontaneous forms of tetany in which there is a drain of calcium for physiological purposes, or in which some other condition causes a drain of calcium. In such cases the parathyroid glands may be relatively insufficient.
A Gram-negative streptococcus is associated with one form of fatal septicemia arising naturally in Macacus rhesus confined in laboratories. This streptococcus differs from Streptococcus pyogenes in its behavior to Gram's method of staining; in its slight fermentative powers; in the persistence of vitality for a very long time in its cultures; in its high degree of pathogenicity for certain lower animals; and in the preservation of its virulence undiminished for many months when cultivated upon artificial media. In the present state of our knowledge this streptococcus must be considered as not identical with any streptococcus heretofore described.
1. The autotransplantation of parathyroid glandules into the thyroid gland and behind the musculus rectus abdominis has been successful in sixty-one per cent. of the cases in which a deficiency greater than one-half has been created. 2. In no instance has the autotransplantation succeeded without the creation of such deficiency. 3. Isotransplantation has been uniformly unsuccessful. 4. Parathyroid tissue transplanted in excess of what is urgently required by the organism has not lived. 5. One parathyroid autograft may suffice to maintain the animal in good health and spirits for many months and possibly for years. 6. Excised or deprived of their blood supply in the course of operation upon the human subject, parathyroid glands should, in the present state of our knowledge, be grafted, and probably into the thyroid gland. 7. Complete excision of the thyroid lobes in dogs may be well borne for a year or more. The myxoedema which usually has manifested itself within a few weeks has not increased after the first few months. May it subsequently diminish with the hypertrophy of accessory thyroids? 8. Parathyroid tissue is essential to the life of dogs, as has been conclusively proved by the result of excision of the sole, sustaining graft. There may be found, perhaps, in our experiments, explanation of the fact observed by others (Enderlen, Payr) that, when transplanted, thyroid preserves its integrity less well than parathyroid tissue. In the instances recorded the amount of thyroid gland excised may have been insufficient to make possible the fullest success of the transplantation; and particularly so when we consider the extent of the hypertrophy of which the thyroid gland seems capable.
1. The inhibiting action of urine on catalase depends to a great extent on its reaction. The urine of a nephritic has no greater inhibiting power than normal urine provided the reaction of urines tested is neutral. 2. The catalytic activity of a single rabbit's blood is constant from day to day. 3. There is considerable variation in the catalytic action of the blood of different rabbits. 4. Following ligation of the ureters the catalytic activity of the blood gradually decreases; the tissues of an animal which has died as a result of ligation of the ureters show a decided decrease in catalytic activity, when compared with those of normal animals. 5. Following bilateral nephrectomy the same decline of the catalytic action of the blood is observed as after bilateral ligation of ureters. 6. Following unilateral nephrectomy the catalytic activity of the blood may temporarily fall and then rise above its previous level, or it may fall continuously. Wherever the continuous fall occurs the animal dies. 7. When the kidneys are allowed to function but the urine is drained into the peritoneal cavity there is no change in the catalytic activity of the tissues post-mortem but a marked rise in the catalytic activity of the blood accompanies the resulting peritonitis. 8. The same rise in the catalytic activity of the blood is obtained in experimental bacterial peritonitis. This might be of diagnostic importance in determining early inflammations of the peritoneum. 9. A kidney functioning normally changes substances circulating in the blood into urinary products devoid of any influence on catalase. If the kidney cannot effect this change, these substances remain unaltered in the circulating blood and by their presence inhibit the catalytic activity of the blood and organs. 10. Nephritis (Uranium Nitrate).-A. In acute nephritis there is a marked decrease in the catalytic activity of the blood and of the tissues post-mortem. The decrease in the catalytic activity of the blood may vary directly with the amount of urine excreted. B. With the onset of uraemia the catalytic activity of the blood decreases markedly and follows in a general way the urinary findings, especially the total amount of urine. If the animal recovers the catalase gradually rises. C. Although the catalytic activity of a normal rabbit's blood is constant from day to day, the activity of blood from a rabbit in which an experimental nephritis has been produced oscillates markedly. The catalytic activity of the blood may under certain conditions indicate the functional sufficiency of the kidneys much more accurately than the urinary findings.
The bacillus of Bordet and Gengou is present in the sputum in early cases of pertussis, and in the lungs at autopsy in fatal cases of the disease. After the second week it is not present in the sputum in sufficiently large numbers to be readily isolated. The influenza bacillus is found at as early a stage of pertussis as is the Bordet-Gengou bacillus, and it persists in the sputum for a longer time. The agglutinins in the blood of pertussis patients are not more regular and not always higher for the Bordet-Gengou bacillus than for B. influenzae. The two organisms are culturally distinct and their action on laboratory animals different. Complement deviation tests with the serum of immunized rabbits show a further difference in the immune bodies produced by the two varieties of bacilli. The negative results of the complement deviation tests with the patients' serum in this study, compared with the positive results of similar tests made by Bordet and Gengou, I am not able to account for. This study has contributed support to the view that the Bordet-Gengou bacillus is the possible cause of pertussis, but it has not produced any distinctively new evidence of this relationship beyond the proof of the wide dissemination of the peculiar bacillus in nature and its occurrence in pertussis. A study of bronchial secretions in other acute diseases of the respiratory tract for the bacillus has not yet been extensively made and is called for. I shall hope to report on this phase of the subject at another time.
1. Under certain conditions, general autolysis does not begin immediately upon the removal of the organ from its circulation. This latent period is more apt to be present in those cases in which the tissues have been temporarily cooled on account of the use of a cold saline diluent or in which the percentage concentration of the inorganic salts (calcium or potassium), of the tissues have been changed by dilution with a sodium chloride solution. The presence of blood and absence of fats and of glycogen in the cells act as important factors in prolonging the latent period. 2. Attempts to produce an alkaline reaction (phenolphthalein) in the tissue resulted negatively. Solutions of disodium hydrogen phosphate and of sodium bicarbonate when added to the liver tissues gave a mixture which was acid to phenolphthalein and had no apparent effect upon autolysis. 3. The addition of antiseptics-chloroform and toluol-markedly decreased the rate of autolysis. Ordinary light produced no effect. 4. Ethyl butyrate when added to the tissue became hydrolysed into butyric acid; the formation of this acid in the mixture caused a decided acceleration in the autolytic rate. The acidity of a solution of dihydrogen sodium phosphate failed to produce a similar result. 5. The figures for the changes in the depression of the freezing-point, non-coaguable nitrogen and reaction of the autolytic mixture do not parallel one another. In some experiments a marked increase in the depression of the freezing-point was unaccompanied by augmentation of non-coagulable nitrogen. 6. General autolysis is the sum total of proteolytic, amylolytic and lipolytic factors. Each of these autolytic factors may proceed alone for a time; the rate of one is decidedly influenced by the presence or absence of the others. The acid products which are the result of amylolytic (lactic acid) and of lipolytic (higher fatty acids) autolysis, exert a pronounced augmentative effect upon the commencement and rate of nitrogenous autolysis.
1. The high value in respect to complement-binding exhibited by blood sera from syphilitics and spinal fluids from general paralytics is associated with an excessively high content of globulin, but there does not exist a direct quantitative relation between the two. Cases of secondary syphilis which have been under prolonged and proper medication do not exhibit the globulin increase and usually fail to give the Wassermann reaction. The active substances entering into the Wassermann reaction are precipitable with the globulin and chiefly with the euglobulin fraction of the fluids. 2. Temperatures of 70 degrees to 76 degrees C. destroy the active substances. Exposed to sunlight the active substances deteriorate slowly. A photodynamic substance such as eosin, under the direct influence of the sun, brings about their complete and rapid destruction. This effect does not occur in the dark. The active substances are subject to tryptic and peptic digestion and are destroyed by weak acids and alkalies. 3. The active substances in the blood sera and spinal fluids cannot be separated from them or from the globulin precipitate by alcohol. 4. There are contained in the alcoholic extracts of normal and syphilitic blood and organs certain acetone-soluble lipoids which possess high antigenic values for the Wasserman reaction. Cholesterin is inactive and the bile salts less active than the lipoidal bodies. 5. Sodium cholate is about as active as sodium taurocholate and glycocholate, but neurin and cholin are inactive.
The foregoing and earlier data taken together demonstrate that an active immunity lasting several years can be produced in guinea-pigs, by the injection of toxin-antitoxin mixtures which have no recognizable harmful effect either immediate or remote. They also show, what might have been anticipated, that under the same conditions mixtures which produce local lesions and which, therefore, contain an excess of toxin produce a much higher degree of immunity than the neutral mixtures, and that an excess of antitoxin reduces the possibility of producing an active immunity, and may extinguish it altogether. There is, therefore, a certain definite relation between the components of the mixture and the degree of immunity producible. Furthermore, toxin-antitoxin mixtures do not change materially within five days at room temperature. They are apparently more efficacious at the end of forty-eight hours than immediately after preparation. The experiments finally prove that a relatively high degree of active immunity can be induced by a harmless procedure, whereas the use of toxin alone leading to very severe local lesions is incapable of producing more than an insignificant protection. The method, therefore, invites further tests in regard to its ultimate applicability to the human being. Unless the subcutis of the guinea-pig reacts to toxin-antitoxin mixtures in a manner peculiar to itself, a practical, easily controlled method for active immunization can be worked out which should afford a larger protection than the serum alone and avoid the complications associated with horse serum. That proportion of toxin and antitoxin which would produce the highest desirable immunity consistent with the least discomfort would have to be carefully worked out for the human subject. From the nature of the immunity induced it is obvious, however, that such a method of immunization cannot take the place of a large dose of antitoxin in exposed individuals who must be protected at once. It would be applicable only as a general protective measure without reference to any immediate danger, since it would take several weeks, perhaps longer, to perfect the attainable immunity. Passing to the theoretical aspects of the facts observed, we find no publications bearing directly upon the subject before us. Madsen has, however, approached it very closely in his experiments on the immunization of animals with mixtures not fully balanced, or, in other words, in which the "toxones" were still free. He found that the injection of such mixtures in rabbits, goats and horses produces an active immunity. He makes the significant remark that perhaps in the immunizing capacity we may possess the keenest reagent for a poison which is not able to exert any toxic action in the body. This is fully borne out by the experiments described, for in these we pass beyond the visible spectrum, so to speak, of the toxin-antitoxin effects, and we are able to recognize toxic action only by the lasting immunizing effects. Another publication which touches upon some phases of the same problem is that of Morgenroth on the union between toxin and antitoxin. Morgenroth brought out the fact that a given toxin-antitoxin mixture is more toxic when injected directly into the circulation than when injected under the skin. Thus, an L(+) dose of 0.78 c.c. toxin + one unit antitoxin applied subcutaneously was of the same toxicity as 0.68 c.c. toxin + one unit antitoxin injected into the circulation. When the mixture had stood twenty-four hours this (L(+)) dose was still 0.78 c.c. subcutaneously, but it had risen to 0.74 c.c. when introduced by the intracardiac route. The author makes two deductions from these results. He assumes that the velocity of reaction between toxin and antitoxin is slow, and that the union is not completed until the mixture has stood twenty-four hours. Hence, the L(+) dose of toxin injected into the blood is higher after twenty-four hours than immediately after mixing the toxin and antitoxin. He furthermore explains the fact that the subcutaneous L(+) dose remains the same whether the mixture is injected at once or after twenty-four hours, by assuming that in the subcutis of the guinea-pig there is a catalytic acceleration of the union of toxin and antitoxin. In view of the writer's results it seems that not only immediately, but four to five days after the preparation of the mixture of toxin and antitoxin, there are still toxic substances available for the production of immunity in the body of the guinea-pig, when the dose of toxin in the mixture is far below the L(0) or neutral level. These toxins may be free, either because uncombined in vitro, or else because the mixture is partially dissociated in vivo, or there may be a third possibility. It is obvious that Morgenroth's investigations, however extensive and thorough, have not exhausted the subject, for both these inferences are incompatible with his. Perhaps his recent important studies on the recovery of toxin from its combination with antitoxin with weak acids may throw more light on this subject. The only conclusion which we may safely draw at this time is that the toxin-antitoxin mixture produces two sets of effects, essentially identical, however. One is visible, as injury (oedema, loss of hair, superficial and deep necrosis of skin, paralysis and death), and corresponds to the toxin spectrum of Ehrlich. The other is invisible and manifests itself only in degrees of active immunity. At what ratio of toxin to antitoxin in the mixture active immunity is no longer produced will vary somewhat with the guinea-pig used, but it is evident that traces of immunity are still transmitted to the young when the amount of toxin approaches half the L(0) dose.
With the return of the circulation, dilation of the pericellular lymph space and slight swelling of the cell body occurs, disappearing as recovery progresses. Chromatolysis, as evidenced by poor affinity for stains, clumping, diffuse staining, and breaking into dust-like particles, induced by anaemia, is not necessarily fatal. Death of the cell is not shown histologically when tissue is removed and fixed immediately after the experiment. Some time must elapse for the detection of the vacuolation, displacement of the nucleus and solution of the chromatic substance, indicative of profound changes. Neurones from different regions as well as neurones of the same region differ in degree of resistance to anaemia. The small pyramidal cells are the most susceptible, and then come the Purkinje cells, cells of the medulla oblongata, retina, cervical cord, lumbar cord, spinal ganglia and, most resistant of all, the sympathetic ganglion cells. Failure to resuscitate animals after anaemia of the central nervous system is probably due to the destruction of many of the cells of the vital centers (vaso-motor and respiratory) which do not have histological peculiarities by which they may be defined. Death, however, of a few cells of any center does not necessarily mean the total loss of function of that center, since the remaining cells may be sufficient to discharge the function of the center.
1. Anatomical lesions of the pancreas occur in more than seven-eighths of all cases of diabetes mellitus. 2. In diabetes associated with lesions of the pancreas, the islands of Langerhans constantly show pathological changes (sclerosis, hyaline degeneration, infiltration with leucocytes and hypertrophy). 3. In some cases of pancreatic diabetes (twelve of ninety cases) the lesion of the pancreas is limited to the islands of Langerhans. 4. In sixteen cases of diabetes associated with hyaline degeneration of the islands of Langerhans the average duration of the disease has been three and a half years; in forty-six cases with sclerosis of these bodies, three years and eleven months. In six cases of diabetes associated with an infiltration of leucocytes about the islands of Langerhans the average duration has been eleven months. 5. Destructive lesions of the islands of Langerhans may be associated with compensatory hypertrophy of other interacinar islands. 6. Peculiar adenoma-like hypertrophy of the islands of Langerhans occurs in a small proportion of cases (seven of ninety) and may be associated with adenomata of the thyroid gland (two cases) and of the pituitary body (one case). 7. Diabetes mellitus occurring in association with haemochromatosis (bronzed diabetes) is referable to pigmentation and destruction of the islands of Langerhans. 8. The pancreas is found to exhibit no pathological changes in twelve per cent. of cases. In approximately one-half of these cases it has been noted that the size of the gland or the number of islands is much less than normal. 9. Fifty per cent. of cases of diabetes mellitus occurring before the age of thirty years are associated with lesions of the pancreas; seventy-five per cent. of all cases of diabetes in which the pancreas is normal occur before the age of thirty years. Ninety-seven per cent. of cases of diabetes occurring after the age of thirty years are associated with lesions of the pancreas; and eighty-six per cent. occur in association with chronic interacinar pancreatitis accompanying arteriosclerosis. 10. Interacinar pancreatitis which occurs in seventy-three per cent. of all cases of diabetes is almost constantly associated with arteriosclerosis: gangrene of the extremities, which occurs with one-fourth of all cases of interacinar pancreatitis, is doubtless referable to the same cause. 11. Chronic interlobular pancreatitis, when associated with diabetes, is accompanied by sclerosis or hyaline degeneration of the islands of Langerhans. 12. Diabetes in association with myxoedema or with exophthalmic goiter may be referable to a lesion of the pancreas, namely, chronic interacinar inflammation with sclerosis of the islands of Langerhans; diabetes in association with acromegaly may be referable to a lesion of the islands of Langerhans, namely, sclerosis and hyaline degeneration with adenoma-like hypertrophy.
1. The secretion of urine and the elimination of fluid through the intestinal canal which are caused by the intravenous injection of solution of 0.85 per cent. sodium chloride are decreased by the addition of calcium chloride to the sodium chloride solution. The secretion of urine is more markedly inhibited than is the elimination of fluid through the intestines. 2. In contradistinction to the decreased elimination of fluid through the kidneys and intestines, addition of calcium chloride to the sodium chloride solution increases markedly the transudation of fluid into the peritoneal cavity. To a certain degree the urine and ascites may be said to increase in an inverse proportion. 3. Although calcium chloride inhibits both absorption from and secretion into the intestines it seems to decrease the secretion more markedly than the absorption. 4. The action of calcium chloride in increasing the ascitic fluid is a double one: first, by diminishing the amount of urine secreted: secondly, by increasing the ascites independently of its action on the kidneys. The latter may be a direct action on the endothelial cells of the peritoneal cavity: this, however, must be determined by further investigations. 5. Addition of calcium chloride to the infused fluids increases the tendency to the occurrence of edema of the lungs. 6. Infusion of large quantities of fluid into animals dilutes the blood, but this dilution seems to be carried only to a certain degree- about 30 per cent.-and to be independent of the chemical character of the solution and of the function of the kidneys. 7. The presence or absence of the kidneys has a marked influence on the intestinal and ascitic fluids. When the averages of ascitic and intestinal fluids per 1,000 c.c. of retained fluid in non-nephrectomized animals and these fluids per 1,000 c.c. of infused fluid in nephrectomized animals are compared, more fluid is found in the case of the nephrectomized animals. This fact can only be explained in part by the shorter time necessary for the same amount of fluid to be retained in the case of the nephrectomized animals. Nephrectomy causes an increase of the ascites and the intestinal fluids through a mechanism which will have to be investigated by means of further experiments.
IN NORMAL ANIMALS (DOGS, CATS AND RABBITS) WHICH WERE KILLED BY EXSANGUINATION, THE BEGINNING OF RIGOR IN PRACTICALLY ALL CASES WAS SEPARATED FROM RESPIRATORY DEATH BY TWO WELL CHARACTERIZED PERIODS: (1) a period of pulsation during which each ventricle still exhibited some spontaneous contractions, and (2) a period of relaxation during which the ventricles, while showing neither spontaneous contractions nor rigor, are more relaxed than in normal diastole, and during which the ventricles gradually lose their irritability. (The cardiac rigor or tonic contraction which was observed by recent investigators to set in immediately after death is an artificial phenomenon produced by filling the heart with saline and connecting it with a manometer.) In the right ventricle both periods are longer than in the left ventricle, i. e., rigor sets in later. Moreover the development of rigor from onset to maximum is also longer in the right ventricle than in the left, although here the difference is less striking. The stopping of spontaneous beating, the disappearance of irritability, and the development of rigor, manifest in both ventricles a topographical progress from the base toward the apex, i. e., the stoppage of beating, the disappearance of irritability and the setting in of rigor occur first at the uppermost part of the ventricle and last at the lowest point of the ventricle. It often occurred that rigor was already present in the basal part of a ventricle while the apex was still beating. It is probable also that the loss of vital activity and irritability and the development of rigor progress topographically from the endocardial to the epicardial surfaces. Prolonged etherization retards the onset, but hastens the development of rigor; atropinization hastens both onset and development. Repeated prolonged stoppages of the heart caused by antemortem (and postmortem) stimulations of the pneumogastric nerves hasten the onset as well as the development of rigor of the heart. All three periods are affected by the inhibitory influence of the stimulation, the period of relaxation, however, seems to be the one which is shortened most. The most probable interpretation of this phenomenon is the assumption that it is caused by an asphyxiation of the cardiac tissues. The stimulations of the pneumogastric nerves seem to hasten also the onset of the general rigor-probably this, too, is the result of some premature asphyxiation of the skeletal muscles.
1. The hook worm of man-both the Old and New World types-contains a weak hemolytic agent active in vitro. It is soluble in salt solution, is easily destroyed by heat and acts slowly. 2. The hemolysin is present in all parts of the worm and probably is associated with the intestinal tract. 3. The hook worm of the dog contains a similar hemolysin. 4. These hemolysins are not specific, but will act on human blood as well as on that of the dog and rat. They are only demonstrable in concentrated extracts. 5. Concentrated extracts of the human whip worm may be hemolytic to some bloods. 6. The round worm of man contains no hemolytic principle in any part of its body. 7. It seems very unlikely that this weak hemolysin found in the hook worm can have any relation to the anemia of uncinariasis. 8. Study of the "blood cysts" in the human intestine shows that the hook worm may live in a small amount of the host's blood for days without causing any marked hemolysis.
THE FOLLOWING INFERENCES MAY BE MADE FROM THE FOREGOING STUDY: 1. The lesions resulting from fat starvation, at least in the case of pigs, do not resemble or even suggest those of rickets. 2. Prolonged fat starvation leads to the entire disappearance of fat from the adipose tissues. The form of fat atrophy observed as the result of experimental fat starvation corresponds to the serous fat atrophy described by Flemming, and is essentially the same type of fat atrophy as that found in the epicardial and perirenal fat in the human subject as the result of wasting disease. 3. The. lecithins of the brain and the fat of the liver are not materially reduced by fat starvation. 4. Fat starvation does not lead to advanced serous fat atrophy of the subcutaneous fat if the animal be given a large excess of carbohydrate food or a considerable excess of the carbohydrate and proteid constituents of milk. 5. Fat starvation causes a very imperfect absorption of the salts of P(2)O(5) from the intestine.
TO SUMMARIZE, WE HAVE BEEN ABLE TO DEMONSTRATE: (1) In a case of acute trichinosis an extensive leucocytosis, with great absolute and relative increase in the number of eosinophilic cells in the blood, associated with a coincident decrease in the quantity of neutrophilic elements. (2) From the examination of specimens of muscle removed during life, besides the peculiar degenerations of the muscle, a longitudinal splitting of some of the fibres; a remarkable transverse splitting of others; a great proliferation of nuclei, about many of which vacuoles are seen; and large numbers of polymorphonuclear eosinophilic cells, which are especially prevalent in the more degenerated areas. (3) In a second case (after death), besides similar changes in the muscle, large numbers of eosinophiles throughout the infested portion. (4) In two other cases, during life, a great increase of the eosinophilic cells in the blood, with a coincident decrease of the polymorphonuclear neutrophiles, associated with leucocytosis, though of less extent than in the first case. (5) In pieces of muscle removed in these last two cases changes in most respects similar to those cited in the first case, but of less degree. (6) The similar character of the nuclei of the eosinophiles and the neutrophiles both in the blood and in the muscle, and the presence in the first case of certain cells which might be regarded as forms transitional between neutrophiles and eosinophiles, suggesting the possibility that the increase in the latter elements may, in these instances, take place in the muscles by direct transition from the neutrophiles.
(1) Typhoid bacilli were demonstrated in the urines of 9 out of 38 typhoid patients (about 25 per cent). 172 specimens were examined with 44 positive results. (2) The bacilli, when demonstrated, were always present in large numbers and in practically pure culture. (3) The bacilli appeared first in the later stages of the disease and persisted in the great majority of cases far into convalescence. The urines of typhoid patients should, therefore, not only be rigidly disinfected during the disease, but they should also be carefully supervised during convalescence. (4) The typhoid bacilli were practically always associated with albuminuria and the presence of renal casts. On the other hand urines containing considerable amounts of albumin and casts in large numbers often showed no typhoid bacilli. (5) Irrigation of the bladder with antiseptic solutions offers a possible means for removing permanently the bacilli from the urine.
The conclusion seems warranted that the giant cells formed in the absorption of coagulated blood serum inserted into the anterior chamber of the rabbit's eye subdivide again into uninuclear small cells that take part with other new-formed cells derived from the lining of this space to form a densely fibrillated mass of tissue that resembles quite closely the cornea in its structure. This demonstration materially strengthens the opinion expressed by the writer in his previous article in this Journal,* that the giant cells in healing non-degenerated tuberculous tissue may separate into small living cells, and that the giant cells of tuberculosis are not necrobiotic elements from the very moment and from the very mode of their formation, as has been the general teaching, especially in Germany.
The typhoid bacillus produces a mild diffusible toxine, partly within the intestinal tract, partly within the blood and organs of the body. This toxine produces proliferation of endothelial cells which acquire for a certain length of time malignant properties. The new-formed cells are epithelioid in character, have irregular, lightly staining, eccentrically situated nuclei, abundant, sharply defined, acidophilic protoplasm, and are characterized by marked phagocytic properties. These phagocytic cells are produced most abundantly along the line of absorption from the intestinal tract, both in the lymphatic apparatus and in the blood-vessels. They are also produced by distribution of the toxine through the general circulation, in greatest numbers where the circulation is slowest. Finally, they are produced all over the body in the lymphatic spaces and vessels by absorption of the toxine eliminated from the blood-vessels. The swelling of the intestinal lymphoid tissue of the mesenteric lymph nodes, and of the spleen is due almost entirely to the formation of phagocytic cells. The necrosis of the intestinal lymphoid tissue is accidental in nature and is caused through occlusion of the veins and capillaries by fibrinous thrombi, which owe their origin to degeneration of phagocytic cells beneath the lining endothelium of the vessels. Two varieties of focal lesions occur in the liver: one consists of the formation of phagocytic cells in the lymph spaces and vessels around the portal vessels under the action of the toxine absorbed by the lymphatics; the other is due to obstruction of liver capillaries by phagocytic cells derived in small part from the lining endothelium of the liver capillaries, but chiefly by embolism through the portal circulation of cells originating from the endothelium of the blood-vessels of the intestine and spleen. The liver cells lying between the occluded capillaries undergo necrosis and disappear. Later the foci of cells degenerate and fibrin forms between them. Invasion with polymorphonuclear leucocytes is rare. Many of the phagocytic cells pass through the liver and lungs, and get into the general circulation. A few come from the abdominal lymphatics through the thoracic duct.
(a). The bacillus isolated by me from the outbreak of choleraic diarrhoea corresponds closely in all essential particulars with that of European chicken cholera. (b). It differs, consequently, from that isolated from previous outbreaks of choleraic diarrhoea in the United States. (c). A study of the acid production by this and allied bacilli would seem to show that the amount of acid produced by so variable a microbe varies greatly and is incapable of affording a further means of distinguishing between allied forms.
Acute interstitial nephritis is found in the infectious diseases of children, particularly in diphtheria and scarlet fever, but may be met with in other infectious diseases. The disease is characterized by general and focal infiltration of the interstitial tissue of the kidney with cells which correspond to those which Unna has described under the name of plasma cells. The focal character of the infiltration is marked; even in the cases in which all parts of the kidney show some interstitial cellular infiltration the cells are most abundant in certain foci. These foci are found in three places: in the boundary zone of the pyramids, in the sub-capsular region of the cortex, and around the glomeruli. A considerable number of cases is found in which the blood-vessels of the boundary zone of the pyramids contain nnmbers of lymphoid and plasma cells without any infiltration of the interstitial tissue. The new cells in the interstitial tissue are due to emigration from the blood-vessels and multiplication by mitotic division of the cells which have emigrated. The cells can emigrate as plasma. cells or as lymphoid cells, and the latter may change into plasma cells in the tissues. In the normal individual, plasma cells may be formed in the mucous membrane of the intestine, where they practically form the entire tissue between the epithelium and the muscularis mucosa, and to a limited extent in the spleen. In diphtheria, in scarlet fever, and probably in a number of infectious diseases, plasma cells are formed in great numbers in the spleen and bone-marrow, and to some extent in the lymphatic glands. In the spleen they are formed from the cells of the Malpighian bodies, which are often principally composed of them, and to some extent from the cells in the pulp. They are formed from the lymphoid cells. No adequate explanation is found for the focal character of the lesions in the kidneys. There is some ground for believing that the physical conditions of the circulation may have something to do with their accumulation in the vessels in certain places. It is also possible that in the interstitial foci there may be soluble substances which exert a positive chemotaxis for them. Such substances may be foundin the urine, which may exert its influence on the interstitial tissue in different places. The explanation of the foci cannot be found in primary focal degeneration of the epithelium. Epithclial degeneration in these cases is always present, but it is diffuse. In foci where it is more intense and due to the interstitial changes, polynuclear leucocytes are found in the tissue, in the degenerated epithellum and in the tubules. Folynuclear lencocytes and not plasma cells are attracted by degenerated tissue. The foci are not due in these cases to the local action of bacteria. In a number of the cases in which interstitial nephritis was found the kidneys were shown to be sterile both by cultures and by microscopical examination. In cases where bacteria were present they were found only in small numbers in cultures and not on microscopical examination, and their connection with the foci could not be demonstrated. In three cases plasma cells were found in the interstitial tissue in definite bacterial diseases of the kidney. In these cases they were not found in connection with the lesions produced directly by the bacteria, but in the periphery of the purulent foci.
Until recently diphtheria " toxin " was supposed to be a single definite substance and to have a definite toxicity in animals and neutralizing power for antitoxin. A fatal dose of toxin, without regard to the conditions under which it was produced or preserved, was supposed to require always the same quantity of antitoxin to neutralize it. Ehrlich's researches have completely done away with this theory, and have substituted for it one which assumes the toxin to be only at its origin a single definite chemical compound with definite physiological and antitoxic properties. According to Ehrlich the toxin is an unstable substance which readily loses its toxicity, while at the same time its affinity for antitoxin may be either increased or decreased. Its neutralization by antitoxin he considers to be due to a chemical union between the toxin and the antitoxin. The results of our experiments as detailed in this paper are fully in accord with those published by Ehrlich, as to the varying neutralizing value of a minimal fatal dose of " toxin "; they, however, go further and indicate roughly a general law in accordance with which these changes occur. The neutralizing value of a fatal dose of toxin is at its lowest in the culture fluid when the first considerable amounts of toxin have been produced. After a short period, during which the quantity of toxin in the fluid is increasing, the neutralizing value of the fatal dose begins to increase, at first rapidly, then more slowly. While the culture is still in vigorous growth and new toxin is being produced, the neutralizing value of the fatal dose fluctuates somewhat, but with a generally upward tendency. After the cessation of toxin production the neutralizing value of the fatal dose increases steadily until it becomes five to ten times its original amount. In our experiments the greatest value for L(+) was 126, the least 27. As at 6 hours L(+) was only 72 and at 28 hours only 91, we doubt whether L(+) ever reaches above 150, and therefore hardly expect Ehrlich's figures of 200 to be realized. When we seek to analyze the above-described process, we find certain facts which seem partly to explain it. Experiments have shown that filtered toxin, preserved for any length of time in conditions under which access of air occurs, gradually loses in both its toxicity and neutralizing power, and that it loses more rapidly in the former property than in the later. Thus, while the fatal dose of a toxin preserved for one year rose from .01 cc. to .55 cc., it lost only half as much in neutralizing value, one unit neutralizing at first 1 cc., at the end of the year 25 cc. These processes take place more rapidly at room temperature than in the ice chest, and in the incubator than in the room. In the fluid holding the living bacilli we have, therefore, after the first few hours of toxin formation, a double process going on, one of deterioration in the toxin already accumulated, which tends to increase the neutralizing value of the fatal dose, the other of new toxin formation, which probably tends to diminish the neutralizing value. The chemical changes produced by the growth of the bacilli in the bouillon tend to aid one or the other of these processes and so to make from hour to hour slight changes in the value of the fatal dose. Later, with the period of cessation of toxin production, the gradual deterioration of the toxicity alone continues, and the fatal dose gradually and steadily increases in its neutralizing value. Ehrlich's theories, as to the splitting up of " toxin " into toxoids having little or no toxicity but on the average full neutralizing power for antitoxin, have not in our opinion been substantiated by the results of these experiments. The difference between the amount of toxin mixed with a unit of antitoxin which causes the first symptoms and that causing death upon the fourth day would be, it is true, explained by his theory, but the failure of this difference to be greater where, by his theories, epitoxoids should be in great abundance prevents our acceptance of his views. The fact of the greater neutralization value of a fatal dose of a deteriorated toxin would be accounted for on his protoxoid theory. This, however, is not proof of its correctness, as other theories, such as the production by the diphtheria bacillus of two or more closely allied toxins, similar to the allied alkaloids produced by plants, would equally account for it, if we supposed the one which had the greater neutralization value was more resistant to destruction than the other. We only advance this theory to call attention to the fact that many theories can on paper explain a process without necessarily being thereby established. Even if his theories prove partially correct, we feel certain that his formula for standardizing toxins is founded upon error and cannot be employed for the purpose intended by him. While we do not believe, therefore, that he has changed the principles of testing antitoxin, yet we believe he has contributed greatly to uniformity in results by calling attention to the necessity of selecting a suitable toxin and by employing and distributing an antitoxin as a standard to test toxins by. In this way smaller testing stations can make their results correspond with those of the central station. In spite of the great variations in the neutralizing value of a fatal dose in different toxins, we do not believe there has been any such great difference in the toxins used by the different stations for testing purposes. Most laboratories have taken the culture fluid at about the time of its greatest toxicity, and the neutralizing value of a fatal dose of this toxin would seldom vary more than 10 per cent above or below the standard now adopted in Germany by the government testing station, this latter being presumably as close as possible to that used to establish the original Behring-EhrIich unit. Where error has been made, it has usually been by taking too old culture fluids, which would cause the antitoxin strength of samples tested to be estimated below and not above its real value. Culture 8, which is used not only by us but by many other laboratories in the United States and Europe, fortunately produces on the 6th day, the time at which the culture is usually removed, a toxin which grades Elirlich's antitoxin within five per cent of the strength given by him. We believe that by using such a bacillus, we can, after gaining a fuller knowledge of its characteristics, obtain a toxin of a known and suitable neutralizing value, and thus always correctly standardize an antitoxic serum. Meanwhile a fairly permanent antitoxin, such as Ehrlich provides, is of immense value in insuring a uniform though not necessarily correct standard among the different testing stations and in allowing of comparison between them.
I. Cultures of B. coli communis, B. typhosus and Staph. pyogenes aureus, when injected into the tissue of the normal spleen, soon disappear from that organ, and indeed from the normal body generally. II. Bacteria injected into a spleen after the whole or a part of the vessels have been tied, multiply in the spleen with great rapidity and continue to supply bacteria to the blood, whence in the healthy body they soon disappear. III. Bacteria injected into the spleen, or subcutaneous tissue, or into the blood current through the ear vein, in cases in which moderate lesions have been made by cauterization or compression in the spleen, liver, kidney, uterus, testicle, peritoneum, or subcutaneous tissue, usually find lodgment in these lesions and multiply there. IV. Even in cases in which numerous foci existed, from which the blood was constantly provided with a fresh supply of bacteria, only few bacteria were found at any time in the blood.
(1) There exists a distinct morbid entity, haemochromatosis, characterized by the widespread deposition of an iron-containing pigment in certain cells and an associated formation of iron-free pigments in a variety of localities in which pigment is found in moderate amount under physiological conditions. (2) With the pigment accumulation there is degeneration and death of the containing cells and consequent interstitial inflammation, notably of the liver and pancreas, which become the seat of inflammatory changes accompanied by hypertrophy of the organ. (3) When chronic interstitial pancreatitis has reached a certain grade of intensity diabetes ensues and is the terminal event in the disease.
1. Dextrose is not in itself injurious but rather favorable to toxin production. When added in quantities not exceeding 0.2 per cent to peptone bouillon freed from fermentable acid-producing substances (muscle sugar) it leads to a maximum accumulation of toxin by utilizing the available peptone to the best advantage. 2. The different courses taken by cultures of diphtheria bacilli in ordinary unfermented peptone bouillon containing muscle sugar and in peptone bouillon made from fermented infusion to which 0.1 to 0.2 per cent dextrose has been added are manifested by an increased production of toxin in the latter as well as by a rapid return from an acid to an alkaline reaction. In the former an acid reaction may prevail even under most favorable conditions. 3. These differences may be explained by assuming either that the acid products of the muscle sugar are different from those of dextrose and non-utilizable, or else that the bouillon contains certain other unknown inhibitory substances removed during fermentation. The use of synthesized media and an analysis of the acid products in fermented bouillon plus dextrose and in unfermented bouillon would aid in explaining the differences. 4. Among the accessory conditions which favor the toxin production in unfermented bouillon, as pointed out by Park and Williams, are increased quantities of peptone, well developed surface growth of the diphtheria bacilli, and a low initial acid reaction (phenolphthalein). In fermented bouillon these accessory conditions are also favoring, though of legs importance.
588.780 grm. of frogs, all of the same sex, of the same comparative approximate weights, taken from the ground about the same time, kept awake and without food for nearly the same time, were divided into equal groups; the one group was poisoned with phosphorus, the other group held as a control. The frogs in the poisoned group lost in dried residue 8.821 grm. or 16.5 per cent of the dried residue of the control group; 1.182 grm. of nitrogen, corresponding to 7.388 of proteid, or 18.45 per cent of the nitrogen and protein in the control frogs; 1.026 grm. of fat, or 22.64 per cent of the fat in the control animals; and 0.261 grm. glycogen, or 13.3 + per cent of the glycogen in the control frogs. I believe that it is obvious that in these experiments no fats were produced from protein. Mathematically, it is possible to conceive that fats could have been formed but entirely burned up. As previously stated, the carbon in the proteid lost during the poisoning was equivalent to 4.600 grm. of fat, and it is conceivable that these 4.600 grm. of fat were formed, but that they, together with the 1.026 grm. of fat actually lost during the experiments, were burned. In brief, the fat combustion might have been tremendously increased, and masked an actual fat formation. This however is unsupported by evidence, and is highly improbable. It is hard to conceive that in an organism whose katabolic functions were greatly augmented as the result of phosphorus poisoning, in which protein, fat, and glycogen were being burned in excess, the carbon of the protein would first have been converted into fat and then the fat burned as such. I believe the only conclusion which can be drawn from these experiments is that no fat was formed as the result of phosphorus poisoning. Thus the fatty degenerations so-called which occurred in these frogs did not comprehend any formation of fat at all, but simply the deposition of fat. These results are directly opposite to those of Polimanti. Polimanti apparently did not weigh his animals before the beginning of the experiment, and based his calculations upon the relation of the fat to the dried residue. Obviously his calculation was based upon the assumption that the dried residue of a frog was unaffected by phosphorus poisoning. Polimanti, in declining to base his calculations upon the weight of the animals when dead, states that as water is often increased, such a calculation would be misleading. But since the dried residue may and does vary, calculations based upon it are also misleading, and thus the only proper basis of calculation is the original weight of the frogs before the experimentation. Calculated upon the basis of the dried residue, in my material the percentage of fat in the control animals was 8.48 per cent, in the poisoned animals 7.86 per cent, so that, even upon the basis of Polimanti's incorrect calculation, in my experiments fat was lost in notable quantity. Just before this study was completed, the publication of Athanasiu, (8) from Pflueger's laboratory, appeared. Operating with a large number of frogs, and under varying conditions, with careful methods and rigid controls, Athanasiu reached the conclusions: that phosphorus poisoning has no effect upon the total quantity of fat in frogs; that it has little effect upon the nitrogen; that it produces a diminution in the quantity of glycogen; and that the fatty degenerations are really fatty infiltrations. While my results agree with those of Athanasiu in the essential point, that no fat was produced by phosphorus poisoning, they differ in that the poisoned frogs, in my experiments, lost fat and protein as well as glycogen, while his frogs lost only glycogen. Since our methods were almost the same, the differences must have resided either in the conditions surrounding the experiments, or in the animals. I do not believe that such differences exist between the Rana fusca and esculenta of Europe and the Rana palustris of America as to explain the differences in our results. These differences I believe may be explained by varying conditions. My animals were kept in a warm cellar, at a temperature of from 18 to 20 degrees C. The period of poisoning with Athanasiu's frogs varied from one to six days; all of my frogs lived over six days, most of them ten or twelve days. Since we know that the katabolic actions of most poisons are greater in prolonged intoxications, it is fair to assume that the time element was the factor in the production of my results. While it would be unscientific and illogical to state that fat cannot be formed from protein, the fact stands that it has never been shown, either in physiology or pathology, that fats are formed from protein. On the contrary, nearly all of the careful work upon the question has yielded negative results. Not. only has it never been shown that, in fatty degeneration so-called, fat is formed from the cellular protein, but it has never been demonstrated that fat is then formed at all, even from glucosides, etc., substances from which fats may be readily formed.
OUR CONCLUSIONS FROM THE LITERATURE AND OUR OWN EXPERIMENTS MAY BE SUMMARIZED AS FOLLOWS: I. Blood for bacteriological examination during life should be taken directly from the veins and in considerable quantity. II. Resorption of toxines is the most important feature in cases of sepsis; pyogenie bacteria invade the general circulation in a rather small proportion even of severe eases, and, as a rule, late in the course of the disease. III. A general infection by the pnenmococcus can be demonstrated occasionally in the late stages of acute lobar pneumonia. IV. The value of blood cultures as a means of diagnosis in obscure cases of sepsis is limited by the fact that invasion of the blood by the specific organism cannot be demonstrated during life in the majority of cases. Positive cultures are very valuable; negative cultures do not exclude local septic infections. V. The detection of specific bacteria in the blood of cases of sepsis and of pneumonia gives a very unfavorable prognosis in most cases. VI. General terminal infections with pyogenic cocci occasionally occur as an immediate cause of death in chronic disease. Local infections processes play this part more frequently. VII. As far as our experiments have shown, invasion of the blood by bacteria during the death agony, with subsequent distribution of the genus to the organs by the circulation, is a rather uncommon occurrence. VIII. Owing to the relative infrequency of agonal invasion, we believe that in the majority of cases where the autopsy is performed promptly after death, the bacteria which are found in the organs succeeded in reaching these organs previously to the death agony, and are associated with the course of the disease. IX. The presence of bacteria in the organs of late autopsies is due in many cases to post-mortem extension from one organ to another, and in some cases to the post-mortem growth of small numbers of genus which were distributed to the organs by means of the circulation.
